Title
Review for Edtv (1999)
Number of Reviews
32

Author
Craig Roush
Release Date: March 26, 1999
Starring: Matthew McConaughey, Jenna Elfman, Ellen DeGeneres, Woody
Harrelson, Martin Landau, Dennis Hopper, Elizabeth Hurley
Directed by: Ron Howard
Distributed by: Universal Pictures
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (sex-related situations, partial nudity, crude
language)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1999/edtv.htm
If John Steinbeck were alive today, he would be proud. The use of one
man as a metaphor for many, a theme so prevalent in his great American
novels, is also a principal element in EDTV. This latest
media-versus-man movie, which might be loosely grouped with last
summer's semiparanoia drama THE TRUMAN SHOW, gives us director Ron
Howard's take on issues of celebrity, fame, misadventure, and the road
less traveled. If not for the been-there-done-that feeling stapled to
EDTV in the wake of THE TRUMAN SHOW this movie would be an innovative
dramedy with much to say and a rather cute means of exhortation. 
EDTV starts at RealTV, a cable television network which specializes in
the FOX vein of it-actually-happened programming. Although the network
is in a slump -- losing to the Gardening Channel, in fact -- program
director Cynthia Topping (Ellen DeGeneres) has a hot idea. To boost
ratings, the network will hold casting calls for a regular individual
and then film his life twenty-four hours a day, indefinitely. Cynthia
chooses San Francisco local Ed Pekurny (Matthew McConaughey) almost by
chance, and soon our unassuming protagonist has more fame then he knows
what to do with. It alienates his girlfriend Shari (Jenna Elfman) and
his brother Ray (Woody Harrelson), and it even causes doubts in Ed's
mind as to whether or not this new life is truly what he bargained for. 
The ending is a clever escape, but it's not what the audience bargained
for, and in that sense it's similar to the Peter Weir-directed THE
TRUMAN SHOW. In fact, a large percentage of the script is lifted the
Weir film, and those who watch these films together will undoubtedly
find countless similarities. However, while THE TRUMAN SHOW prefers to
run in metaphorical circles and dance with esoteric symbolism, EDTV
chooses to focus on a literal message. Any larger elements are purely
speculative during the picture, and only upon viewing the film straight
through is there any merit to thematic criticism. Director Howard's
internal message is simple and straightforward: the grass is greener on
the other side. 
The grass may be greener on the other side for Ed Pekurny, but certainly
not for Matthew McConaughey, and this is one of the film's only
shortcomings. The cast is a dynamic bunch of individuals, well chosen in
sum and critical to success individually, but the themes do not befit a
lot of Hollywood veterans. McConaughey is not credible in the everyman
role of Ed, and he seems to play the character off the wall rather than
down to earth. Most of Ed's family, including Woody Harrelson, are
similarly loony, and they don't help the realism. Truly, only Jenna
Elfman (TV's "Dharma and Greg") gives a standout performance as Ed's
girlfriend Sheri, and the character itself as well as society's reaction
to it is one of the most realistic parts of the movie.
Then again, EDTV is a fantasy product, designed to suspend reality and
surround itself with "what-ifs." In this respect it's a thought-
provoking product, and very much the equal of THE TRUMAN SHOW. 

Author
Eugene Novikov
Peruse through Ron Howard's legacy and you'll find few smudges. From the 
titillating Ransom, to the awe-inspiring Apollo 13 and Cocoon, he's 
brought us quality yet unpretentious entertainment through his years as 
a director, a producer and a writer (and who could forget his stint as 
Richie Cunningham on Happy Days?). But everyone of his followers knew 
that, like every great director, he wouldn't be able to keep his lucky 
streak alive forever (remember Steven Spielberg's 1941? Francis Ford 
Coppola's Jack?). As luck would have it, the place where Howard's train 
derails is the moronic new comedy EDtv. Not only does this film have the 
dubious distinction of beating a great concept straight into the ground, 
but it also does it with no dignity whatsoever.20
How does Matthew McConaughey's career continue? He's been universally 
panned, he can't act, and he has single-handedly spoiled (or at least 
reduced the quality of) almost every film I've seen him in. But continue 
his career does, and everyone who sees EDtv will wish that it didn't. He 
stars as Ed, a video store clerk selected by a struggling cable network 
to be on tv 24 hours a day, with his whole life in continuous live 
broadcast. This, of course, involves cameramen following him around 
everywhere he goes, which, understandably, presents some problems for 
him and the people around him.20
At first, Ed jumps at the chance to become famous and wealthy. And for a 
few months he wallows in being begged for autographs, being nationally 
recognized and getting huge bonus payments. He has fun with the 
cameraman who have the unenviable task of staying with him all day and 
all night. But then, things start to get out of whack. His girlfriend 
(Jenna Elfman) dumps him because of lack of privacy. His brother writes 
a book entitled "My Brother Pissed on Me." His family becomes alienated. 
He wants to quit, but will the network let him?20
Of course, this is a great opportunity to present some anti-media social 
commentary. And you know what? This whole thing sounds a bit like that 
little movie that we all saw last year called The Truman Show, doesn't 
it? Yes, comparisons to that masterpiece are inevitable. While Truman 
presents its themes with maturity, subtlety and hilarity, EDtv is 
childish, in-your-face and dull. Truman did not scream "Mass-media is 
bad" at its audience. EDtv pummels the audience with images of people 
shielding their faces from cameras while dramatic music plays. When you 
compare the two films, the latter is almost insulting.20
All of this wouldn't be so bad if the characters were compelling or if 
the film was funny. No such luck. Ed is not even a character but a 
nebulous representation of your everyday, happy-go-lucky guy. 
Unfortunately he is also a total and complete loser. He has no life and 
few friends. He talks like he's drunk and he's not funny or interesting 
in any conceivable way. This makes the already very weak film completely 
collapse. Think of a 2-hour film centered around one person who you'd 
rather not spend 2 hours with, and you'll be thinking of EDtv.20
The failure of Ed the character and EDtv the movie can be at least 
partly blamed on the failure of McConaughey in the lead (what do you 
mean, "What else is new"?). Certainly anyone else (Jim Carrey, for one, 
ridiculous as the suggestion is) could have done at least a slightly 
better job portraying the protagonist of this lame picture, or at least 
as good a job as the god-awful script would permit. The supporting 
actors fare slightly better. Woody Harrelson as the brother whom Ed 
pissed on is equally horrible, but Ellen DeGeneres and Rob Reiner as 
studio executives are occasionally funny.20
This is a very, very bad film. But somehow I feel that there is more at 
stake here than millions of people wasting two hours of their lives. The 
problem is that thanks to EDtv, in the future, any filmmaker that 
attempts a film about a person trapped in a tv world will likely be 
beating a dead horse. The Truman Show presented the concept. 
Pleasantville reinforced it. EDtv grabbed it by the throat and pounded 
it's metaphorical head against the ground

Author
John Carroll
EDtv is a comic look at the premise of The Truman Show. 
Unfortunately, Ron Howard forgets the point of a comedy is to be clever and
funny.
   When I first heard about Jim Carrey in The Truman Show, it sounded
like a great basis for a comedy.  After the hilarious Liar Liar, The
Truman Show looked like a great follow-up.  Well, after I looked into it, I
found out it was a drama.  Granted, it was wonderful, but I always thought it
could have been just as good as a comedy.  Enter Ron Howard and EDtv. 
It is not exactly like The Truman Show.  The star is a man by the name
of Ed Pekurny, plyed by Matthew McConaughey.  Unlike The Truman Show, Ed
knows that the camera is following him around.  Now, this is SUPPOSED to be a
comedy.  Unfortunately, it is a snooze that I could have saved my $7.50 on.
   EDtv had great potential.  I went in with a clear mind and determined
myself not to compare it to The Truman Show...And I still hated it.  I
wanted to laugh, I really did.  I sat through all two hours thinking: "This has
to be funny.  How could they screw such a great idea up?"  But, they did.  Even
when the wacky Cliff Howard makes his cameo appearance, I could not even muster
a chuckle.  That is how bad EDtv is.  
   This film is star-packed.  I have to give it that.  You would think that
such a great cast would be able to at least bring some depth to the film, but
alas, it did not.  If anything, it made the film even worse.  You wonder how
such stars could rope themselves into such a horrendous film.  Jenna Elfman and
Woody Harrelson approach respectability, but it is not enough.  This film is
just plain bad.
   Matt McConaughey plays Ed, the star of the movie and of the show.  The
camera follows him around his life as he does his routine.  It is pretty bad at
first.  Ed turns out to be some stupid, average joe.  Then his brother, played
by Woody Harrelson, gets on screen and things are supposed to light up.  Well,
they don't.  It plods along as Ed meets Shari (Jenna Elfman) and they hit it
off and Ray (Woody Harrelson) gets mad.  It goes along slowly...Very slowly as
the relationship between Shari and Ed progresses, and then Jill enters Ed's
point of view.  Still boring.  The only good jokes in this film is the USA
Today Poll about Shari and Ed, plus the joke about nudity on the internet.  It
stops right there.
   To top things off, Ron Howard tries to add drama to this film.  One thing
you never attempt to do, Ron, is put drama in a terrible comedy.  It is hard
enough to do in a regular comedy, let alone a horrendous one such as
EDtv.  Whether it be Ed and his grandfather or Jenna and Ed in their
romance, which seems like slow motion, it all just seems to put EDtv
further and further down.  I see EDtv as a funeral.  They had a good
idea, but just kept shoveling more and more dirt on it and taking away the
glimmer.
   Overall, EDtv is just plain BAD.  The idea was great, but the
execution was horrible.  EDtv should be a lesson to all motion picture
executives: If you have a great idea and an all-star cast, do it right!  But,
EDtv does not, unfortunately, and we have to suffer for it.  Maybe
someone will do it right...Someday.
One Star our of Four Stars
The Movie Page- http://jump.to/moviepage
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Author
Mark O'Hara
Visit Online Film Critics Society at http://www.ofcs.org
Ron Howard's 'EDtv' is full of ideas that double back upon their own 
trails, like tricky raccoons on the run.
Where else but in Hollywood would you find a work that indicts 
television, made by people whose roots are in television?  Ron Howard 
starred in 'The Andy Griffith Show' and 'Happy Days.'  Rob Reiner, who 
plays Mr. Whitaker the network honcho, was the meathead Michael Stivic 
in 'All in the Family.'  Woody Harrelson, the title character's brother 
Ray, attained major airtime in 'Cheers.'  Even Clint Howard, a fixture 
in all of his brother's movies, played a couple of seasons in 'Gentle 
Ben.'
Their experience certainly serves them well in 'EDtv,' as we see 
realistic treatments of what goes on behind the camera.  It seems that 
each character in the film has an agenda, a collection of motives that 
are always self-serving and selfish.  In the end the film is a dead-on 
satire that entertains but, paradoxically, contradicts itself with a 
Hollywood ending.
A producer at a floundering cable television network, Cynthia (Ellen 
DeGeneres) conceives a risky scheme intended to boost ratings.  She runs 
a contest in which countless average citizens audition to have their 
daily lives put on the air.  What is Cynthia's hope?  That she'll save 
her own career as well as the careers of her staff.  It's a last-ditch 
attempt, and it succeeds.  Though at first the life of Ed (Matthew 
McConnaughey) appears boring (how long can viewers be captivated by 
tours of Ed's apartment and by the flavor of his down-home stories?), 
the program soon becomes as exciting as the juiciest soap opera.
When does the ho-hum documentary become drama?  When the camera crew 
follows Ed to his brother Ray's apartment, 'EDtv' watchers discover Ray 
has spent the night with a woman who is not his girlfriend.  Said 
girlfriend Shari (Jenna Elfman, TV's Dharma) phones immediately to 
confront Ray.  The nastiness escalates when Ed takes the crew to the 
digs of the offended Shari, his purpose to plead Ray's case.  Passionate 
whims take over, however, and we witness an unwitting kiss as Ed and 
Shari fall for each other.  What follows is not as down and dirty as 
'The Jerry Springer Show,' but still vile and savage.
As the title character, Matthew McConnaughey turns in his best 
performance in memory.  Ron Howard directs well the sequences in which 
we see Ed's Texas charm.  Ed is a 31 year-old under-achiever, a video 
store clerk who is unremarkable but nevertheless likable.  In previous 
roles McConnaughey seemed two-dimensional at best, but here we care 
about his character when the television show begins to make off with his 
dignity.  Sure, Ed has fun for awhile;  McConnaughey elicits our 
sympathy for Ed when things start to go really wrong.
Woody Harrelson has no trouble being the most flamboyant presence in the 
film.  His Ray is passionate, rascally, vindictive.  We can imagine this 
guy writing a book called 'My Brother Pissed On Me,' though he has never 
even read a book.  It's unfortunate that Harrelson's screen time 
dwindles as the film progresses.
Jenna Elfman is fine as Shari;  she plays well the part of being 
embarrassed by the ever-present cameras.  Shari is a driver for UPS, and 
of course becomes the object of national scrutiny as her budding, 
somewhat forbidden romance with Ed appears in every living room.  Her 
wounded act becomes stale after awhile, though.  As Ed and Ray's 
stepfather Al, Martin Landau delivers another memorable supporting 
performance.  Too bad this movie appears too early in the year to be 
remembered for the Oscars.  In a small role, Clint Howard is convincing 
as the man faced with following Ed's footsteps, coordinating the 
broadcast from the television truck.  This outing brings some 
characterization, as Clint Howard's technician has hair plugs:  "I've 
stopped payment on the plugs.  You gave me doll hair!" he rages into a 
phone at one point.  Perhaps this Howard deserves a bigger part next 
movie - his face is certainly sharp and intriguing in middle age.
An unusual motif is noticeable in the way characters spend their spare 
time.  As they watch television - which is always on, in homes and bars 
- these people seem constantly to be exercising.  They peddle curious 
stationary bikes, lift weights, all in pursuit of the slimness and 
fitness that the filmmakers suggest are included in the goals of average 
Americans.  Even more curious is Ed's status as blue-collar hero:  in 
fact he's a chameleon with his accent, switching from a neutral 
middle-American diction to an East Texas twang at will.  The result for 
the viewer carries a disappointing, Roseanne-like effect.  This guy's 
posing as a good old boy but embraces the same materialistic and 
romantic ends as the rest of us.
Another of the film's agendas is to meet the standards of political 
correctness.  In portraying the audience of Whitaker's network, the 
writers show the gamut of races and preferences:  a homosexual couple, 
an African-American couple, even a group of factory workers.  Although 
the device of highlighting these viewers' responses is right out of 'The 
Truman Show,' it serves as a fascinating sort of subplot.  Many of the 
responses themselves are hilarious, but their ultimate purpose is a 
self-reflexive parody.  Let's face it - we American viewers are the 
targets of Howard's double-edged satire.  Yes, the movie attacks the 
executive schlumps, but it also assaults the mind-sets that demand the 
type of programming of which EDtv is a sleazy example.  What you have to 
love about the film is that it pokes so much fun not only at the average 
Joe - represented by Ed Pekurney and his family - but at the average 
jerk who tunes in. 
There's no question Ron Howard knows the formula for a slick and 
successful Hollywood movie.  In 'EDtv' he and his screenwriters, 
veterans Lowell Ganz and Babaloo Mandel, depict life's hard knocks and 
nuances;  but the last quarter of the film neatly fits back into the 
mold of happy and romantic closure.  The film is generally pleasing, 
especially in its treatment of Americans' obsession with media in all 
its crafty forms.  Ideas flow freely here, and fans can only hope that 
at least one of the films in his future will buttress Howard's headiness 
with a risky and less mainstream ending.
Get Your Private, Free Email at http://www.hotmail.com

Author
DeWyNGaLe
EDTV is the third recent film with a similar plot line.  In June 1998, the
first one was released.  The Truman Show starred Jim Carrey as a man whose
entire life was a television show, and he didn't even know it.  All his friends
and family were just acting.  The second one came in October 1998, which was
called Pleasantville.  Two kids get stuck in a sixties sitcom and they inspire
the people in the show to live, and they become color once they discover who
they really are.  The third is EDTV, which is about a television show that
shows the life of someone twenty four hours a day.  Whoever is chosen by True
Tv, the company who is going to put the show on the air, will be a volunteer to
put their life on television.  The True Tv committee working on the show
consists of Cynthia, played by Ellen DeGeneres, who thought of the entire idea
of putting someone's life on the air.
The search will be a long one to find the right person to put on television. 
After a long search, Ed Pekurny, played by Matthew McConaughey, is chosen. 
They feel that he would be a fun person to watch twenty four hours a day.  Ed's
brother Ray, played by Woody Harrelson, likes the idea of the show, and wants
to advertise his new gym on television.  Ed's parents aren't very supportive of
the idea, and Al, who is Ed's mother's second husband, is extremely uneasy
about the idea.  Ed doesn't mind the cameras following him all day though. 
After Ray and his girlfriend Shari, played by Jenna Elfman, break up, Ed starts
going out with her.  Shari is on television constantly now also, and she
completely hates it.  She has no privacy, and she cannot go on.  She tries to
avoid the cameras as much as possible, but with Ed following her, it is
impossible.  I really liked the way the relationship between Ed and Shari was
developed.  Both the characters are developed very well, and we are given
background on both characters.  Therefore, they are both extremely fun and
likable characters.
At first EDTV was barely watched by anyone.  Everyone thought it was a low
point in America, but after people started watching it more and more, it grew
on to them.  EDTV has become a phenomenon.  Ed is about the only one that is
enjoying being filmed though.  The people involved in his life are very upset
and outraged about the things that are being put on to television.  
The performances in EDTV are wonderful.  Matthew McConaughey and Jenna Elfman
especially were wonderful in the large, star crowded cast.  It was nice to see
Ellen DeGeneres again after her show was canceled.  In the film, she delivers a
lot of laughs.  I feel that she was cast perfectly as Cynthia.  Although she
wasn't developed, she added a lot to the film.  Others who added to the film
were Elizabeth Hurley, who played Jill, a model who starts to take the place of
Shari as Ed's love interest, Dennis Hopper as Hank, Ed's biological father, and
Rob Reiner as Dr. Whitaker.  
At first, I thought that EDTV would be a complete rip-off of The Truman Show. 
It turns out I was wrong, considering EDTV was better than it.  Unlike The
Truman Show, EDTV is very funny, and isn't very dramatic.  I like the comedic
path better than the dramatic path that The Truman Show took.  Although the
second half in EDTV is based more on human emotions and the effects on Ed's
life, it still has the fun feel to it. EDTV was a lot of fun to watch.  It had
a soundtrack that was fun music, and it added to the feel of the film.  There
are a lot of fun and also touching moments in EDTV, some that I will think
about for awhile.  Towards the end of the film, it started to drag the
slightest bit.  Luckily, they ended it with an ending which was satisfying,
before it dragged on any more.  All of the elements were there to make this
film great, especially the large cast.  Expect large numbers at the box office
for this one.
The Bottom Line- A large cast of familiar, funny faces, makes EDTV great fun. 

Author
Edwin Jahiel
EDtv (1999) ** Directed by Ron Howard. Written by Lowell Ganz and Babaloo
Mandel, based on the Quebecois movie  "Louis XIX: Roi Des Ondes," written
by Emile Gaudreault and Sylvie Bouchard and directed by Michel
Poulette.Photography, John Schwartzman. Editing, Mike Hill  & Dan Hanley.
Production design, Michael Corenblith. Music,  Randy Edelman. Produced by
Brian Grazer and Ron Howard.  Cast: Matthew McConaughey (Ed), Jenna Elfman
(Shari), Woody Harrelson (Ray), Sally  Kirkland (Jeanette), Martin Landau
(Al), Ellen DeGeneres (Cynthia), Rob Reiner (Whitaker), Dennis Hopper
(Hank), Elizabeth Hurley (Jill) et al. A Universal/Imagine release. 120
minutes. PG-13.
There is a temptation to say that EDtv is the poor man's The Truman Show.
But this would be a simplification, except in the sense that Truman was a
more complex and ambitious idea. One might also say that Pleasantville or
the earlier Mad City have some marginal bearing on EDtv, yet the
connections are even more tenuous. And, in case EDtv is thought to be
either an original movie or a derivative film, remember that it is a
remake.
In 1994, Canada (with a big infusion of French funds), released a comedy
whose title, in English, would be Louis the 19th: King of the Airwaves-- a
pun on the kings of France, the last of those named Louis being number18
(reigned 1814-1824).
In the Montreal-shot production, Louis, an employee with a tedious job in a
TV shop, has a   a passion for being in the audiences of TV shows, games
and the like. He wins a contest and is chosen to spend three months being
stalked by cameras night and day --and shown on live TV. This makes of a
nonentity an overnight celebrity. But there is a price to pay, in lack of
privacy and interference by the medium, especially since television and
other people try to spice up   Louis's dull life and run it. So, Louis
retaliates...
The film was a major hit in Canada and, in the Genie awards received the
Calude Jutra Prize. So it is not really "an obscure movie" as the studio
claims. It was re-written with its major premises intact by the team of
Lowell Ganz and Babaloo Mandel. They have done very well on films such as
City Slickers, Mr. Saturday Night, or  A League of their Own. Also in
entertainments directed by Ron Howard: Night Shift, Splash, Gung Ho
(underrated), Parenthood.
I like much of the work of those writers and that director, and I love the
name Babaloo which was, in the 1940s I believe, a very popular song, either
Latin American or a good imitation of the Latino style. (Mr. Mandel's
parents, assuming they chose the name, ought to have received a medal for
courage and for making people smile each time they hear that name!)
In EDtv, the protagonist is Ed, played by Matthew McConaughey with long
facial stubble, as if he couldn't decide whether to shave it or to grow a
real beard. It's rather typical of his other indecisions. Ed, who works in
a San Francisco video store, is a nice, pleasant loser, neither strongly
conscious of this nor noticeably unhappy.
True TV, a two-year old Bay Area cable channel owned by a Mr.Whitaker (Ron
Howard), is going downhill, badly.  Its program director Cynthia Topping
(Ellen DeGeneres) comes up with the plan of following a perfectly ordinary
person's life, on live TV, around the clock, as things happen  or don't
happen. "It's not the Louds. It's not MTV's Real World. There will be no
cript, no editing, no performers."
In the search for a candidate, True Tv films people at random. In a bar,
Ed's older brother Ray (Woody Harrelson) mugs for the cameras, but it is Ed
who gets elected. (Ed sports a beer bottle attached to his neck by a
string. You see the type).
There are minor technical complications as Ed is always followed by three
teams, plus a director inside a large TV truck. Shades of Big Brother,
fixed cameras are all over his house --with one exception, the Sanctum
Sanctorum bathroom. More importantly, loud-mouthed brother Ray who plays
the field, has just cheated on his current girl  Shari (Jenna Elfman), who
delivers for UPS and is also a loser, that is, in her affairs with men.
But now Ed and Shari fall in love --and it's all on millions of TV screen
across the USA.
The plot thickens. The movie alternates between, or combines the actual
EDtv program. This.  of course involves Ed's family and all others around
him; the cameramen, the sound-people, he crowds watching and reacting to
the TV screens, the producers at Real TV... Technically, it's  cleverly
done.
There are good bits and pieces throughout. Amusing television talk-shows
are like Chinese boxes since they are within television which is within the
movie we watch. In the shows  pundits make comments on the EDtv phenomenon.
Among them are Michael Moore, George Plimpton and Bill Maher who make fun
of themselves, and Arianna Huffington who does not. Yet in the medium run,
if not before, some medium-tedium sets in. Those audiences who are like me
and the friends I saw the film with become listless. And even the better
parts get often lost in the overall morass.
A major episode involves ambitious actress Jill (model Elizabeth Hurley)
who puts the make on Ed in order to advance her career. She disappears,
then is hired by True TV to seduce Ed. Throngs jam Jill's street. Ed
succumb and sex begins (but no nudity, no consumation) as the cameras look
on. For all practical purposes, the couple are porno stars, in what may be
the climax (pardon the expression) of the story.
What surfaces sure as shootin' is that we all have our secrets. Ed lives at
home with his brother (who seems to have additional digs), his sister (who
has a funny affair), mama Jeanette (Sally  Kirkland) and his loving, ailing
stepfather Al (Martin Landau) who married Jeanette after the boys'
biological father, no-goodnik  Hank,  ran out. Hank, presumed dead,
suddenly reappears.  Dennis Hopper plays him as a sad sack in a touching,
stretched-out cameo.  This leads to more complications of a farcical or
black-humorous type, with quid pro quos, and secrets and lies revealed,
down to the finish line.
The moral of the film is stridently simple and painfully familiar . No
matter who and what you are, if you get on the tube, you become famous.
Famous means popular.  Popular means admired.
I remember some cases that go back several years. Certain individual had
become famous because of their infamies, and whe later they became
candidates for office (in the Southwest, I believe) they were elected over
normally decent folks.
That the media are corrupt is old news, or that they act as an Invasion of
Body Sntachers. But what the movie tells us too is that the public's taste
is zilch, that the Jerry Springer ethos prevails, that the I.Q. of the
masses is even lower than a sloth's or a lemur's. Since scientists may
dispute this comparison, perhaps I should say a chicken's.
For all its comedic intentions, the picture boils down to illustrating the
triumph of sub-mediocrity . The kind you see when Jay Leno (whose show is
included in the picture) interviews strangers on the street. The kind that
in talk-shows, when the "Applause" sign comes on, makes studio audiences
knee-jerkily obey it.
A positive note. All  performances are first-rate. My favorite
show-stealers are Dennis Hopper and, in his small but ever so ingeniously
humorous part, and Martin Landau who seems to laugh at his own character as
he makes cracks about his impending death.  Ellen DeGeneres is now much
better off out of the closet. She can have roles that mean something.
I would not discourage anyone from seeing this picture, even though its
gratification is merely instant. There's no residue, no aftertaste. You
don't go home thinking about the film. And I doubt that it's among the
pictures you'll want to see again. After all, what EDtv says to us is :
"Hey, movie audiences, you laugh at the idiot public, but this public is
you!"
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Author
Steve Rhodes
How would you feel if "USA Today" took at a poll, and 71% of America
felt you weren't good enough for your lover?  It happens to poor Shari
in Ron Howard's funny new comedy, EDTV.  She feels pretty awful, as you
might imagine, but her boyfriend, Ed, tries to cheer her up by
reassuring her of his affection for her.  His declaration of love,
however, is interrupted when he realizes that the readers have a
suggested a pretty exciting list of alternative women for him.
After a couple of supercilious roles in CONTACT and AMISTAD, Matthew
McConaughey, as the Texas hillbilly ED, redeems himself by proving that
he really can play an average Joe.  In a lookalike role as Ed's
obnoxious, extroverted brother Ray, Woody Harrelson gets to ham it up,
but Jenna Elfman, as Shari, upstages both of them.  Elfman provides the
sweet center of Howard's cinematic bon-bon, and her role is the closest
that Howard comes to creating a sympathetic character.  Most of the
roles are played for pure comedy without feeling the need to overlay
them with any pretense at deeper meanings.
The best part of the film is the bright and accessible script by the
comedic writing team of Michel Poulette and Lowell Ganz, who
collaborated before with Howard on the enormously successful SPLASH and
PARENTHOOD.  "We're getting our butts kicked by the Gardening Channel,"
television producer Cynthia (Ellen DeGeneres) complains.  "People would
rather watch soil."  Her solution is a 24-hour cable show featuring a
single man, sort of a real-time version of the PBS series about the Lou
family from the1970s.  In a nationwide survey, Ed, a 31-year-old video
store clerk, is chosen as the "lucky" guy to be the star of "TrueTV."
Ed's debut is anything but auspicious.  As his beer-can dancing clock
wakes him, he sticks his hand in his sweat pants so that he can scratch
his crotch.  As the head of the network, Whitaker (Rob Reiner) senses a
disaster in the making.  When a sleepy Ed finally gets up enough energy
to fix himself some pop tarts, Whitaker sarcastically calls it an action
sequence.  Filled with incredibly boring minutia -- Ed's lack of skill
as a toe nail clipper, for example -- the show looks like it may not
last the week, if that far.
Whitaker never lets his underlings forget who is in charge.  "You know
how I know I'm right?" he tells Cynthia in the parking lot as they stand
beside their respective cars.  "Because I'm driving the big car, and
you're driving the little one."
It is the introduction of Shari, who starts off as Ray's girlfriend,
into the story that saves Ed's show from instant oblivion.  With love
and conflict in the storyline, the show hooks America from college
campuses to tattoo parlors.  Ed becomes such an enormous celebrity --
"He's a Spice Girl.  He's a Beanie Baby" Cynthia proclaims -- that he
needs security and police escorts wherever he goes.  To ground this
notoriety, Shari plays a sweet UPS driver, who hates the publicity as
much as Ed laps it up.
Even talk shows get in the act.  "Fame has become a moral goal in this
country," one pipe smoking intellectual pontificates on the air.  "It's
its own virtue."
In contrast to the-girl-next-door, Shari, Elizabeth Hurley plays a gold
digging model who comes on to Ed.  She breaks off her kisses to pose for
the cameras.
The mystery in the story is whether Ed will ever be able to quit, and,
if so, how?  An even bigger one is whether the writers will be able to
do it in a way that audiences feel satisfying.  Suffice it to say that
the ending undoubtedly passed all of the test screenings with flying
colors.  With Ron Howard as the director, you can be sure that you'll
leave with a satisfied smile on your face.
So then we have that one final question.  How does this movie differ
from THE TRUMAN SHOW?  EDTV never tries to be anything more than a
diverting little comedy.  THE TRUMAN SHOW aimed much higher and
succeeded.  It was funny and insightful with very serious themes whereas
EDTV just wants to entertain you.  Both achieve their goals.
EDTV runs 2:00.  It is rated PG-13 for mature themes and some profanity
and would be fine for kids around 11 and up.
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
Web: www.InternetReviews.com

Author
Greg King
EDTV (M).  
(Universal/UIP)
Director: Ron Howard
Stars: Matthew McConaughey, Jenna Elfman, Woody Harrelson, Ellen 
DeGeneres, Martin Landau, Sally 
Kellerman, Bob Reiner, Elizabeth Hurley, Clint Howard, Dennis Hopper, 
Viveka Davis, Adam Goldebrg, 
Robert Pastoriza, Harry Shearer, Jay Leno, RuPaul, Michael Moore, Gedde 
Watanabe
Running time: 123 minutes. 
A man has his life broadcast to an eager television audience,
twenty-four hours a day.  This premise sounds remarkably similar to
last year's brilliant The Truman Show.  (It is also a concept that the
ABC embraced with its warts-and-all reality-based documentary series
Sylvania Waters a decade ago.)  Although Edtv may recall The Truman
Show, it is actually based on a little known 1994 French/Canadian film
entitled Louis 19: Le Roi Des Ondes (Louis 19: King Of The Airwaves).
What also separates Edtv from The Truman Show is that, in this comedy,
the central character is fully aware of the intrusive presence of the
cameras from the start.
Cable station True TV is struggling in the ratings, even being
beaten by The Gardening Channel, and the programming executives decide
to beef up their image.  They decide to follow one ordinary person's
life on camera, twenty-four hours a day, live, unrehearsed, unscripted
and unedited.  Video store clerk Ed Pekurney (Matthew McConaughey,
from Lone Star, A Time To Kill, etc) is chosen from the audition
tapes, mainly because of his down to earth charm, his sex appeal and
his goof ball sense of humour.  Unexpectedly, Ed becomes a sensation,
and the audience for this reality based family soap opera grows.  But
under the unflinching scrutiny of the tv cameras, a number of
skeletons start rattling out of the Pekurney family closet.  Network
executives are also only too willing to manufacture events in Ed's
life to increase audience interest and thus further boost their
ratings.
Ed finds himself initially swept away by the euphoria of his
sudden popularity, until he discovers that being a celebrity carries
its own baggage.  This is a theme that Woody Allen explored with
limited success in his recent, occasionally self indulgent Celebrity.
Edtv brings irony and cutting wit to its cynical exploration of the
intrusive nature of the media, and the powerfully persuasive and
seductive nature of fame.  This clever film also explores how the
media exploits the American public's insatiable desire to know even
the most salacious details of the lives of celebrities.
Edtv reunites director Ron Howard with his two favourite
writers Lowell Ganz and Babaloo Mandel, who previously wrote Splash
and Parenthood for him, but the creative team seem to have stumbled
occasionally with their latest collaboration.  Howard is usually a
director with a keen gift for storytelling combined with astute
commercial instincts.  Those gifts seem to have deserted him a little
here.  Howard makes his salient points well enough, but then proceeds
to bludgeon them with sledgehammer-like subtlety.  Many scenes seem
unnecessarily repetitive, and the film could have been tightened up
considerably in the editing room.  There are also a number of ideas
that fall flat and lead nowhere in particular, contributing to the
film's bloated look.
As usual, Howard has assembled a top notch cast, who deliver
solid performances under his assured direction.  McConaughey is very
likeable and appealing, and he makes Ed an attractive and sympathetic
character.  Woody Harrelson delivers a solid performance as Ed's
sleazy, narcissistic brother Ray, while Martin Landau and Sally
Kellerman (from MASH, etc) lend some much needed sympathy to their
roles as Ed's parents.  Ellen De Generes is marvellous as Cynthia, the
tv executive who develops a conscience, while tv star Jenna Elfman
(Dharma And Greg) brings some depth to her role as Shari, Ed's girl
friend who finds she cannot handle the pressure of living her life in
the media spotlight.
Edtv has a much lighter tone than Peter Weir's similarly
themed film, and it will likely appeal more to those audiences who
couldn't embrace the concept behind his intelligent and imaginative
vision.

Author
Jamie Peck
Rating: *** (out of ****)
Universal / 2:02 / 1999 / PG-13 (language, sexuality)
Cast: Matthew McConaughey; Jenna Elfman; Ellen DeGeneres; Woody
Harrelson; Rob Reiner; Sally Kirkland; Martin Landau; Viveka Davis;
Dennis Hopper
Director: Ron Howard
Screenplay: Lowell Ganz; Babaloo Mandel
The Andy Warhol-professed notion of 15 minutes of fame seems to have
been invented for people like Monica Lewinsky, today's hot pop act du
jour, and now Ed Pekurny, the centerpiece of Ron Howard's new comedy
"EDtv." As played by Matthew McConaughey, last seen brandishing
six-shooters in "The Newton Boys" about a year ago, Ed's an easygoing
San Francisco video store clerk whose Southern twang, down-home charm
and almost soothing presence make him the sort of average Joe you'd like
to see good things happen to. In short, he's the perfect tour guide
through Howard's giddily twisted take on celebrity status.
Sad to say, but such niceties don't exactly befall our hero, who is
hand-picked by a struggling cable network to be the focus of a live,
24-hour-a-day television show that follows and broadcasts his every move
- think of it as a non-stop version of "The Real World" without the
gloomy roomies and cautious censors. Oh, sure, things start off on the
right foot, as Ed's without-warning popularity sends him on the fast
track to becoming a household name. He gets the ratings, the autograph
hounds and even the sweet fiancee (Jenna Elfman) of his loutish brother
(Woody Harrelson), after the omnipresent camera crews catch the latter
inflagrante.
But the luster begins to fade, the media is soon taking national polls
regarding the personal life of this public man, and the Nielsen-minded
producers are going to disturbing lengths to rake in the numbers - as
far as arranging Ed to have a session of on-air lovin' with a alluring
model (Elizabeth Hurley). These wild ups and downs, while not
necessarily grounded in reality, provide a generous helping of yuks and
yucks - the latter when Ed partakes in lovely chores like
toenail-clipping and the reliable early-morn crotch adjustment on the
idiot box. "EDtv" ultimately shuns a few of the questions it poses, but
a movie this infectiously genial need not be concerned with the big
picture.
So fast do the laughs, spoofs and assorted gags come that there's little
time to take in how low-key the romantic angle is - McConaughey and
Elfman click but hardly combust, a hindrance which may actually aid the
couple's ultimate dilemma - or that a subplot revealing some aired dirty
laundry in the Pekurny family past cuts an unfortunate path into soapy
melodrama; if I were a watcher, I'd probably use these parts for
bathroom breaks and nacho runs. Also, the finale, as Ed turns the tables
on the station monsters who exploit his should-be-private crises, lacks
the early zip and zest, ending up like a really long joke that almost
blows its punchline.
Luckily, a superlative cast of supporting oddballs as endearing as
McConaughey make even the weakest passages something to sit through.
Martin Landau gets choice one-liners as Ed's decrepit, wheelchair-bound
stepdad ("I've gotta pee. Wish me luck."), while Sally Kirkland -
where's she been, by the way? - does nice work as his white-trash mom,
the kind that fancies KFC as quality dining. Dennis Hopper shows up
briefly as Ed's biological father, and Howard wisely gives ex-sitcom
stars Ellen DeGeneres and Rob Reiner plum roles as program honchos,
respectively conflicted and conscience-challenged. DeGeneres, for one,
has never been brighter.
So chalk up a hit for "EDtv," and let's hope it gets renewed for next
season. Something so fresh, sneaky and entertaining certainly deserves
its share of the viewership, but don't go expecting the wisdom of "The
Truman Show" or face dire disappointment. Comparisons are inevitable -
and maybe just a little inappropriate given the two movies' varied
agendas - but here goes anyway: Think of "The Truman Show" as the
deeper, smarter and more thought-provoking classy cousin to "EDtv"'s
silly, rude and quick-to-please country bumpkin. Ed himself may put the
boob back into boob tube, but it's hard not to like what you see.
Š 1999 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit The Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/
"20 Dates' tells the story of Myles Berkowitz, a man who wants to make
a film, and to fall in love. These areas are his two greatest failures,
professional and personal,' so he decides to make a film about going out
on 20 dates. By the film's end, he has won the love of the lovely
Elisabeth - maybe - but his professional life is obviously still a
failure." -Roger Ebert on "20 Dates"

Author
"Average Joe" Barlow
        What turns regular people into celebrities?  I suspect
it's the public's need to adore, to project their own dreams
of glamor and stardom onto others.  People often become famous
not because of any spectacular talent or achievement, but simply
because we see them on television every day.  In an era when
committing adultery with the President of the United States is
not punished but rewarded with book deals and invitations to
Hollywood Oscar parties, it's clear that John Q. Public is
willing to elevate anything that walks across the TV screen
into a cultural icon.
        Ron Howard's "EDtv" is an intriguing satire about this
disturbing trend.  Smart, involving, and howlingly funny, the
movie has the courage to (subtlely) scold its audience for
engaging in hero worship.  A cross between "The Truman
Show" and a pack of slobbering paparazzi, "EDtv" takes an
unflinching look at society's preoccupation with fame, and
doesn't like what it sees.
        The story: a small cable network called True TV finds
itself unable to break free of dismal ratings.  "We're getting
our butts kicked by the Gardening Channel!" frets a nervous
executive.  "People would rather watch soil!"  But network
programmer Cynthia Topping (Ellen DeGeneres) has an idea: why
not take an average guy, specifically chosen to appeal to the
masses, and put him on television 24 hours a day?  Observing
how the public tends to bond with people on television, Cynthia
hypothesizes that such a person would end up as a sort of
'virtual friend' to the viewing audience... and who doesn't like
to spend time with their friends?
        Many people are auditioned before the network finally
decides on the personable Ed Pekurny (Matthew McConaughey).
Ed, an amiable loser in his thirties, agrees to have every
moment of his life broadcast on television for one month.  As
compensation, Ed will be paid a princely sum, which he hopes
will help his financially-strapped family.
        The idea seems like a win-win situation, and Ed has fun
with the role for a while.  But when his life becomes a national
phoenomenum, our hero is unsure how to handle his sudden fame.
People become so addicted to watching Ed's every move that they
forget to live their own lives.  Everyone he knows suddenly
treats him differently: his mom dresses in her finest clothes
any time Ed (and the camera crew) comes to visit, while his
brother Ray (Woody Harrelson) never passes up an opportunity to
tell his brother about his new gym, effectively obtaining free
advertising by doing so.  Indeed, Ed learns that his endorsement
can be a valuable commodity: when he casually orders a Pepsi on
TV one day, the Pepsi Corporation makes sure Ed's apartment is
filled with their products from that moment on.  As in "The
Truman Show," much of the humor here comes from the various
attempts by people and businesses to use the camera as a way to
obtain free product placement.  Ed learns to use this to his
advantage: when his father Hank (Dennis Hopper) finds himself
unemployed, Ed offers to promote any company's product on the air
if said company will give his dad a job.
        But fame has its downside: everywhere he goes, poor Ed
is hounded by rabid fans, and the novelty soon wears off.  But as
the program nears the end of its month-long run, Ed makes an
unpleasant discovery: his ratings are so high that the network
has decided to renew the program; due to a clause buried deep in
his contract, Ed is powerless to prevent them for doing so.  The
feeling of claustrophobia is contagious, as director Ron Howard
("Apollo 13") has wisely chosen to shoot much of the film with
oppressive close-ups, which make the audience feel as though
we too are sharing Ed's nightmare.
        The constant presence of the camera crew is enough to
strain the budding romance between Ed and Shari (Jenna Elfman),
his brother's ex-girlfriend.  (How does Ray find out that Ed is
dating his ex?  By watching their first kiss on TV, along with
the rest of the nation.)  This displeases the viewing audience,
who generally don't like Shari: she's too "real," and not
glamorous enough for a big star like Ed.  (A poll in USA TODAY
reveals that most viewers think Ed should hold out for a more
Hollywood-esque lover.)  The network executives pay attention
to the survey, and bring an actress named Jill (Elizabeth Hurley)
into Ed's life.  Ed doesn't realize that Jill is merely a network
ploy designed to further improve the show's ratings; the poor lug
thinks the beauty queen is actually interested in him.  This is
perhaps the scariest aspect of "EDtv": the thought that
someone's life could be so heartlessly manipulated in order to
garner ratings' dollars.  If the market research doesn't approve
of Ed's relationship with Shari, then sorry, she's gotta go.
        Matthew McConaughey does wonderful things with this
role, making Ed Pekurny likable and empathetic.  He's a genuinely
nice guy, just going with the flow as best he can.  He does not
ask for the flood of attention and adulation he receives; because
of this, he remains human right through to the end.  Nor is
McConaughey the only actor doing fine work here: Rob Reiner
has a terrific time as the cartoonish Whitaker, the villainous
network president who refuses to release Ed from his contract
after the show becomes a hit.  But the film is stolen by Martin
Landau's warm portrayal of Al, Ed's elderly stepfather.  I was
reminded of his fine performance as Bela Lugosi in Tim
Burton's "Ed Wood" (for which Landau deservedly won a "Best
Supporting Actor" Oscar), because, just like his performance
as Lugosi, Landau here is sensitive yet irreverent, serious yet
zany, crass yet loveable.  ("I've gotta go to the bathroom," he
cheerfully informs his family at one point.  "Wish me luck!")
        There are a couple of minor problems.  Although we're
cheering for Ed to win back his independence and elude the
cameras, even if temporarily, the least satisfying moments of
the film are those in which our hero does just that.  Without
the camera crew to play against, the movie's storyline and
romance feel a bit mundane.  Seeing Ed and Shari share a
romantic moment alone is not nearly as fun as seeing them
share the same moment with millions of people.  Although we
want Ed to succeed, we have to admit that his story is more
interesting when he doesn't.
        Nor is the film's final solution to Ed's problem
particularly satisfying.  It's an unwarranted and inappropriate
descent into potty humor, feeling like something tacked on at
the last minute specifically to appeal to the same audience
the film so brilliantly satirizes for the rest of its running
time.
        These are minor problems, however.  "EDtv" is rich in
pointed satire, centering around our tendency to make people into
celebrities.  Why do people become famous?  Because they're on
TV.  Why are they on TV?  Because they're famous.  "EDtv"
serves as a reminder of something we often forget: people on TV
are just that: people.  They needn't be placed on pedestals,
worshipped, or forced to life their lives under the unwelcome eye
of public scrutiny.
  ("EDtv" invades your local movie theater's privacy on
    Friday, March 26.)

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please
write to: joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Author
Ross Anthony
Channel X is loosing in the TV wars to the Gardening Channel. "We're being
beat out by soil!" the producer cries, scrambling for a drastic measure she
gets the go-ahead on a scheme to have one average person in his average life
filmed live all day. She chooses Ed, an ordinary guy not unlike your cousin
or brother-in-law or you. Channel X becomes EDTV: "All Ed, All the Time".
The first few days of EDTV are dangerously boring, Ed drops a Pop-Tart in
the kitchen and a station executive blurts "Oh look, an action sequence."
But things quickly pick up when Ed's brother (Woody Harrelson) cheats on his
girlfriend who basically runs crying into the arms of innocent Ed -- and
it's on every TV set from Anchorage to New Orleans.
Matthew McConaughey gives a flawless performance as the American everyman.
"I prop the mirror up like this, and wah-la ... I can watch the TV while
sitting on the can. Yea, I might not be much in the business world, but I'm
a winner in the bathroom." He's cute and innocent, yet as apt and
charismatic as Paul Newman. Woody Harrelson is as flamboyant as ever and
Jenna Elfman is simply irresistible as the emotional love interest..."shout
out 'guys suck' then go eat a pound cake."
Two Qualms: 1) In a scene where Ed and crew (ergo, the viewing world) catch
his brother with another woman ... the brother fails to shut the apartment
door, thereby practically showing off his blunder -- I absolutely don't buy
it. 2) Ed, in an attempt to sneak away from the cams to visit his
girlfriend, decides his car is a good place to hide. (As if it hadn't been
broadcast on national TV at least twice a day.)
Anyway, good performances by everyone, including director Ron Howard. He's
sprinkled the film with sugary side gags that sweeten it's appeal. Though
the thunder of its big idea may have been lost to "The Truman Show"
(released months prior), this screenplay still has real and punchy dialogue.
Despite it's faults "EDTV" will engage from beginning till end.
Starring Matthew McConaughey, Jenna Elfman and Woody Harrelson
Directed by Ron Howard
Produced by Brian Grazer and Ron Howard at Image/Grazer/Universal.
Screenplay by Lowell Ganz and Babaloo Mandel.
Grade..........................A-
--
Copyright Š 1999 Ross Anthony, currently based in Los Angeles, has scripted
and shot documentaries, music videos, and shorts in 35 countries across
North America, Europe, Africa and Asia. For more reviews visit:
http://RossAnthony.com

Author
Christian Pyle
TV producer Cynthia Topping (Ellen DeGeneres) has an idea for a cable network
specializing in "reality shows":  take an average joe and broadcast his life on
TV everyday.  A talent search turns up Ed.  Ed Pekurny (Matthew McConaughey) is
a nobody, a 31-year-old video store clerk with no ambition.  He takes the offer
and Ed TV is born.  The show becomes a phenomenon when a romance develops
between Ed and his brother's girlfriend Shari (Jenna Elfman).  However, Shari
objects to dating with millions of peeping toms watching.  Ed doesn't
understand; although he's strangely unexcited about being a star, he accepts
his on-camera life casually.
Life becomes increasingly difficult for Ed and his family.  Everywhere he goes
crowds and cameras follow, and the constant attention threatens to devour
everyone around him.  "USA Today" takes polls on whether Shari is good enough
for Ed.  When Ed's father (Dennis Hopper) returns after a twenty-year absence,
the cameras record Ed's emotional confrontation with his mother (Sally
Kirkland) and stepfather (Martin Landau).  When Ed decides he wants out, the
network executive (Rob Reiner) says that Ed's contract gives them the right to
film him for as long as they want.
When "Edtv" was first advertised, I had the same reaction as most people: 
"Didn't they already make this movie?  It was called 'The Truman Show.'"  I
ignored the denials of director Ron Howard and various stars as they made the
rounds on interview shows and waited until "Ed" came creeping to cable before
seeing it.  There are basic similarities in the plots of "Ed" and "Truman"
(man's life is broadcast on TV, man decides he wants out of the glass house)
and in the things they satirize (loss of privacy, pop culture crazes), but the
focus is entirely different.  In "Truman" those issues were secondary to the
more esoteric theme of an everyman (Jim Carrey as Truman) discovering that a
god (Ed Harris) controls his life.  In the best parts of "Ed," the focus is
squarely on the twin streams of voyeurism and exhibitionism that fuel our
media-saturated society.   And the other parts?  By the end, the romantic
comedy has taken over center stage, and the movie's attempts to imitate the
comedy of "There's Something About Mary" fall flat (like Ed does on Elizabeth
Hurley's cat in one such scene).
Matthew McConaughey is the worst actor in Hollywood, but he seems to have
finally found his niche in this movie.  He was incredibly unconvincing as a
lawyer (in "A Time to Kill" and in "Amistad") and as a theologian (in
"Contact"), but as a lazy doofus McConaughey lives the part.  Among the
supporting cast, Martin Landau deserves special mention for his touching
performance as Ed's ailing but still upbeat stepfather.
Ironically, a movie about shameless self-promotion offers lots of opportunities
for . . . you guessed it . . . shameless self-promotion.  The Ed TV broadcasts
include an advertising area at the bottom of the screen, and the logos of many
real life corporations appear there.  Pepsi even puts a soda machine in Ed's
apartment.  Also, cameos abound.  Look for Jay Leno, Bill Maher, RuPaul,
Michael Moore, George Plimpton, Merrill Markoe, and Arianna Huffington to
appear as themselves.
Bottom line:  When "Ed" is on target, it fires straight and true.  The rest
we've seen before.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.madreview.com/main.html

Author
Walter Frith
'Ed TV' had me mildly interested for about the first half its running
length.  But after that, it made its point and then just kept going on
and on before finding a trivial way to conclude itself.  How appropriate
that a film about television should have so many people from
television's history in it.  Woody Harrelson ('Cheers'), Ellen DeGeneres
('Ellen'), Rob Reiner ('All in the Family'), Jenna Elfman ('Dharma and
Greg'), and Martin Landau ('Mission Impossible', 'Space: 1999').
Screenwriters Lowell Ganz and Babaloo Mandel even got their start on the
small screen, and directing it all, little Opie and Richie Cunningham
(Ron Howard).  The star of 'Ed TV' (Matthew McConaughey) saves the film
from being a total failure just as he did with 1996's 'A Time to Kill'
which also hung on by a thread every time he wasn't on screen.
McConaughey is starting to fall into the same trap as George Clooney in
so much as he is extremely talented but can't quite find the right film
role after a few years on the big screen to really push him over the
line into true stardom.
In 'Ed TV' McConaughey stars as Ed Pekurny, a 31 year-old video store
clerk who gets selected by a failing network to be the star of its new
show.  A show without scripts, directors or focus.  It's the brainchild
of a programming executive (Ellen DeGeneres).  And taking credit for it
all is a shady and shark like fellow executive (Rob Reiner).  It's
entitled Ed TV and the concept is simple: an ordinary man's life will be
put on television 24 hours a day as he goes about his usual business and
every detail of his life will be for the general entertainment of the
viewing public.  Actually, Ed isn't on television when he sleeps but the
cameras are there to greet him when he opens his eyes in the morning.
Sound familiar?  'Ed TV' is, in many ways, the reverse of 'The Truman
Show' where a man's life was on t.v. from the cradle into his 30's but
the only difference is that he didn't know about it and Ed does.
Ed's family is quite a handful.  His older brother Ray (Harrelson)
believes he should have been chosen for the show and although the rest
of the family is against the idea at first, Ray says:  "He's 31 years
old and works as a video store clerk.  What's he going to do?  Spend the
rest of his life re-arranging "Ernest" movies?"  Ed and Ray's mother and
step dad (Sally Kirkland and Martin Landau) have a solid marriage at
first but the new show brings out secrets that may threaten their
relationship when Ed's long lost dad (Dennis Hopper) comes to visit.
Ray's fiancé Shari (Jenna Elfman) eventually falls for Ed, complicating
things even further and Ed wants to quit the show but the network won't
let him out of his contract.  He breaks up with Shari and the audience
is dying to see him get it on with a hot model (Elizabeth Hurley).  We
constantly see people from all over America watching the show, injecting
their own opinions about what should happen in Ed's life and the show's
direction in many ways is determined by polls taken and the published
results show up constantly in the newspaper USA Today.  Ed rides the
zamboni at hockey games and is cheered on by folks, has his image
plastered on the side of city buses with a caption beside it promoting
the show, has people following him on the streets wanting his autograph
and there are plenty of in-jokes about television.  Put that together
with plenty of annoying product placements and advertisements and you
REALLY have a movie about t.v.!
Gee, did I describe the film enough for you?  My point in this case was
to tell you more than I had to really, to illustrate that most of this
happens in about the first hour to 75 minutes and then the film gets
bogged down with reflection on the part of Ed as he looks back on the
whole experience with regret and the film shifts gears from comedy to
drama and can't decide what its real purpose is.  The best performance
in the film comes from Harrelson and Ganz and Mandel's script has its
usual flubbering of jokes that are in bad taste, inventing new terms and
combining some old ones for a few belly laughs but the film feels like a
failed sales pitch where you think you may have the potential to buy a
product you'll like, but you just can't quite see yourself paying for
it.
The film does make some good points about the state of television in the
90's where trashy television pays off with enough people supporting it.
A major news story came out at the end of 1998 citing that network
television viewer ship was down a whopping 12% for the year, making it
the biggest loser in media competition.  When a professional wrestling
program is currently the biggest show on cable, what does THAT say about
the state of quality?  Not a lot in my opinion and that's sort of what
'Ed TV' is like.  It's staged, it's false, and it doesn't mean a whole
lot except for what you already know about television.  How many people
want to lay down money for a big screen movie with a small screen
message?  I don't.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
Steve Kong
There is only one good reason to see EDtv. Matthew McConaughey? No. The
crowd-pleasing-take-no-risks direction by Ron Howard? No. The funny, yet
unoriginal, script by Michel Poulette and Lowell Ganz? No. I'll tell you the
only reason to see EDtv later on in the review.
TrueTV is a cable broadcast company that is struggling to get better ratings
(it is doing worse than the gardening channel). The woman put in charge of
rescuing the cable channel is Cynthia (Ellen DeGeneres) Toppings. Cynthia comes
up with the idea of putting a camera on a man 24 hours a day and broadcasting
that. A great idea especially if you look at how engrossed people are when
spying or peeping into other people's lives. Look at the many webcams available
on the Internet (including the infamous Steve-Cam that, at times, points at
me). People are just intrigued by the idea of watching someone else's life.
The man that Cynthia picks as the star of this 24-hour TV-cast is Ed (Matthew
McConaughey) Pekurny. Ed is a 31-year old video store clerk that, when at a
bar, wears his beer around his neck. His family is disfunctional: his father
left him at an early age, his brother Ray (Woody Harrelson) is a "blossoming"
entrepreneur, and his sister's a drunk dating a cocktail lounge piano player.
And this is also the perfect person for Cynthia's project  Ed is charming and
good looking with enough family problems for some potential onscreen drama.
The first few days Ed's life are pretty uneventful. The show seems like it's
about to sink, the network executives are calling for the show to be cancelled.
That is until Ed falls for his brother's girlfriend, Shari (Jenna Elfman). And
this is where the drama in Ed's life kicks into high gear.
As EDtv becomes increasingly more popular, Ed finds out that being famous is
not all that it's cut out to be. The price of celebrity is the loss of privacy.
Ed finds this out rather quickly as his show's ratings skyrockets.
The idea behind EDtv is not original, everyone's already heard of The Truman
Show starring Jim Carrey in which a man is on TV 24-hours a day also. So, is
EDtv different from The Truman Show? Definitely, whereas The Truman Show was
about a man unknowingly stuck in a TV world, Ed chooses to be on TV all day.
Then there is the issue of believability and real-world-ness. EDtv feels real
and has that sense of "it could really happen." The Truman Show doesn't.
Ron Howard is a director who takes no risks when doing a film, which is fine,
he puts out crowd-pleasers. Films that everyone likes but are not exactly
innovative. EDtv is another one of those films. Howard is given a great idea to
work with, but doesn't take it to its full potential. Instead he keeps the film
light-hearted. There could have been so many other things that Howard and the
two scripters could have looked at, but didn't  which is somewhat of a
disappointment. Howard does a good job with EDtv, but it could have been
better.
Scripters Michel Poulette and Lowell Ganz start off EDtv well enough and for
about half of the film they keep it moving at a good pace, but the script
starts to lose steam as we roll into the second hour. They throw twists into
Ed's life to try to spice it up, but I did end up looking at my watch a few
times wondering when the film was going to tie things up and finish.
Matthew McConaughey does well as Ed. Other performers also fair well. These
other performers include Ron Howard's brother Clint as an EDtv director with a
hair-plug problem, Martin Landau as Ed's stepfather ("I gotta pee...wish me
luck."), and Ellen DeGeneres. But the performer to look for, and the reason to
see the film, is Jenna Elfman. Elfman is best known as Dharma from ABCs sitcom
Dharma and Greg. Elfman lights up the screen every time, she is one of those
performers whom you just like from the very start. Kudos to Elfman for a
wonderful performance that rescues EDtv.
There are two things that feel out of place in EDtv. The first is Rob Reiner
who is the head of TrueTV. He plays a mean-spirited executive that only cares
about the bottom line that we're all supposed to hate. But, it's Rob Reiner!
It's pretty hard to hate Rob Reiner and in EDtv I couldn't really get myself to
hate his character. The second is Elizabeth Hurley's character, whom really
didn't help to do anything. The subplot with her as a model vying for Ed's
attention so that she can get TV exposure is a waste of time.
Catch EDtv during a matinee showing to see Jenna Elfman who is the highlight of
the film. EDtv is a film that has great potential behind it, but no one in the
director and screenwriter's chairs to actually make it more than just a
crowd-pleaser. This could have been one creative and genuinely intriguing film.
 recipe for a hard boiled review:  one egg, two cups water, a pot,
 a helluva attitude, and a guy who loves the cinema.
 i'm your hard boiled movie guide.

Author
Berge Garabedian
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
It's just a matter of time before this movie concept actually materializes
itself into the fabric of our real life cable network channels, but until
that time, I guess we have to settle for the always reliable direction of
Ron Howard, a script by the kings of harmless comedies, Babaloo Mandel and
Lowell Ganz (based on the French film, LOUIS 19), and the acting chops of a
wide range of Hollywood thespians.
PLOT:
Regular Johnny Lunchpail dude gets paid by a cable network channel to
televise his entire life on TV as it happens live. He agrees and ultimately
turns into a media sensation and major celebrity in the eyes of the millions
of people that watch him daily. These changes affect every relationship in
his life, including the most significant one with a woman who touches his
heart, but not those of his fickle TV viewing audience.
CRITIQUE:
Light, safe, enjoyable romantic comedy with a good premise, charming leads,
offers just enough cute, cuddly and funny moments to satisfy the general
population. Now despite clocking in at a heftier time than anticipated (2
hours+), I think this movie works particularly well because of the potent
acting talents of its two main stars, Matthew McConaughey and Jenna Elfman.
Admittedly, I was never a fan of Elfman before this film, but she gives a
great, loveable performance that most everyone should enjoy. And yes, I even
thought she looked adorable in that UPS outfit! McConaughey also punches up
the film with his authentic performance of Joe America, with the ideal
balance of charisma, humor and drama. The rest of the cast is also pretty
solid in their roles, but I felt that the amplitude of characters left some
to be underdeveloped. For example, the Woody Harrelson role started off
strong, but ended pretty flat, while Rob Reiner's character seemed like a
one-dimensional cookie-board cutout role generally used to satisfy the
screenwriters' need for an audience-satisfying retribution finish, which
didn't leave much to the imagination.
Having said that, this film had me chuckling and even laughing along for
most of its run, with the title of Woody Harrelson's book in the film,
generating my hardiest guffaw. There are also plenty of cameos sprinkled
throughout this party which seemed to resonate an overall sense of easy and
clean humor (The lack of uninhibited sex, violence and open vulgarity
obviously well calculated.) The soundtrack seemed like a constant, with
every other scene containing a new song, and the style, pretty
straightforward. And even though I don't particularly recall one superior
scene or even one hoppin' song from the movie, I can say that it was
entertaining, and that it should pull in some decent numbers at the
box-office. Go see it with your loved one. It's safe, it's fun, and nobody
gets hurt. Hi Mom!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
COMING SOON to JoBlo's Movie Emporium

Author
Curtis Edmonds
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
EDtv is the story of a man named Ed (Matthew McConaughey) whose life is the
subject of a television show that runs all day, every day, across the
nation, up close and personal.  And if that sounds familiar, keep reading.
Ron Howard's EDtv was unfortunate enough to follow the similarly-themed The
Truman Show into theaters, and as a result, it may never find as wide of an
audience or as generous a critical reception.  What a pity.  EDtv is
everything that The Truman Show isn't:  funny, smart, entertaining,
sophisticated, and wry.  The Jim Carrey effort is as monolithic, grandiose,
and pretensious as the giant dome of its soundstage, and as bland as its
population of Stepford extras.  EDtv is as quirky and funny as the streets
of San Francisco where it's set, and is populated by a small, diverse
universe of off-beat characters who would be quickly shooed out of
Seahaven.
It helps that the protagonist of EDtv isn't making any great acting
stretches.  Where Jim Carrey was straining to talk out of his mouth instead
of his butt in Truman, all McConaughey has to do is play a good ol' boy
from Texas transported to San Francisco.  Ed is, perhaps, the only
thirtysomething video store clerk in California who's not working on an
independent movie -- the only thing he's working on is the beer he has on a
leash around his neck.  He's picked almost by accident to be the star of
the new show on the "True TV" network, and accepts the idea of having the
cameras watch every detail of his life because it pays pretty good, and
hey, how else is he ever going to be on TV?
Whether by design or accident, Ed turns out to be an ideal personality for
live TV.  He's got a good up-and-down relationship going with his brother's
ex-girlfriend (Jenna Elfman) and a riotous family led by his dimwit brother
(Woody Harrelson) and his elderly stepfather (Martin Landau, who gets
laughs every time he opens his mouth.)  The funniest scenes in the movie
are the ones that highlight these relationships, primarily because the EDtv
show allows them to keep tabs on Ed through their Trinitrons.  EDtv does a
wonderful job of setting up these relationships and using the TV show as a
vehicle to transform them.
And McConaughey's easygoing charm and appealing smile don't hurt one bit.
Ed seems like a guy you'd want to hang out at the pool hall with, and
McConaughey never makes him annoying, never mugs for the camera, never uses
his newfound celebrity to push people around.  You couldn't ask anyone to
do a better job in this role than McConaughey does.
To have a good TV show, though, you have to have more than just a good
star.  For one thing, it helps to have an audience.  The audience was one
of the annoying conceits of The Truman Show was the audience.  Every once
in a while, the story would cut away to someone watching -- nay, staring --
into their television set, watching the antics of Truman Burbank with rapt
attention.  The Truman Show audience was wise to every nuance of the show,
schooled in the protagonist's history, and seemingly is unable to move from
their couches.  This may not be all that different from your typical
television audience.  To be honest, it's not all that different from what I
do on a Sunday afternoon watching the Cowboys play the Giants.  But the
constant image of millions silently staring at flickering screens,
enraptured by the life of a tremendously boring insurance salesman, did
nothing but accent the annoying smugness of The Truman Show.
The audience is a part of EDtv, too, but it's a different audience, and a
better one.  The pretensious Truman Show would have us believe that it's
the number-one show, worldwide, has been for years, will be forever.  EDtv
executives know better:  all they need to be successful is to have people
watch for five or so minutes, two or three times a week.
It's a smaller audience, and a busier audience.  We see people watching
EDtv while going about their daily chores, exercising, chopping bell
peppers, what have you.  Only the teenagers and college kids are watching
closely (which tells you all you need to know about the types of shows that
are on TV nowadays).  It's a smarter audience, too.  The EDtv show runs
sixteen hours a day, with the network wisely deciding that no one really
needs to see Ed sleeping.  But most importantly, the EDtv audience, unlike
The Truman Show audience, is actually being entertained.
Both EDtv and The Truman Show make the same assumptions about our culture,
or significant lack thereof.  As our technology explodes, making more and
more bandwidth available, the quality of programming has imploded.  What
we're left with is an even vaster wasteland than we've ever had before,
populated by "irritainment" and least-common-denominator programming.  EDtv
and Truman are the reductio ad absurdum of this line of thinking, but at
least EDtv realizes that even the most absurd of shows has to entertain on
some level.  The scene where Ed trims his toenails is more entertaining
than anything we see in The Truman Show.  More than that, EDtv is a more
realistic look at television, and as such, has more success as a satire.
Compare the harried, frenetic workplace of the TrueTV headquarters to the
serene, Godlike lair of Ed Harris and tell me what's the truer picture of
entertainment today.
I can't say for sure, but I think EDtv works better as a movie because its
creators have more television experience.  (If anyone in this country has
grown up on TV, it has to be Ron Howard.)  Howard wisely decides to forego
the highbrow approach and make a well-written middlebrow comedy -- higher
quality than you get on Must See TV, but in the same spirit.  Most of the
supporting actors are best known for their TV roles:  Ellen DeGeneres as
the harried True TV producer, Rob Reiner as her boss, Woody Harrelson as
the steroid-crazed brother, Jenna Elfman as the pouting girlfriend.  (Not
to mention Howard's Happy Days buddy Donny Most as a colorless network
yes-man, and brother Clint Howard as the harried man-behind-the-curtain
directing the show.)  TV types don't get a lot of respect in Hollywood for
some reason -- witness Oscar shutouts for Howard's Apollo 13 and Reiner's A
Few Good Men -- but the hilarious, well-crafted EDtv demands a level of
respect at least equal to that of you-know-what..
In fact, forget I ever said anything about The Truman Show.  Remember
Splash?  Tom Hanks and John Candy and Darryl Hannah as the mermaid?  It's
like that:  a good, funny, warmhearted Ron Howard comedy, as welcome as
bluebonnets in the Texas springtime.  Go see EDtv and forget you ever heard
of a movie called...
Wait a second... forget... I forgot something... dangit, what was it...
Oh, yes!  Fellow members of the Elizabeth Hurley Admiration and
Appreciation Society, front and center.  Our Liz has just but a short role,
but it's well worth the price of admission... especially if you can catch
the Entrapment trailer with Catherine Zeta-Jones.  Enjoy.
"No children have ever meddled with the Republican Party
and lived to tell about it."  -- Sideshow Bob

Author
Scott Renshaw
EDtv
(Universal)
Starring:  Matthew McConaughey, Jenna Elfman, Woody Harrelson, Ellen
DeGeneres, Rob Reiner, Sally Kirkland, Martin Landau, Elizabeth Hurley.
Screenplay:  Lowell Ganz & Babaloo Mandell.
Producers:  Brian Grazer.
Director:  Ron Howard.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  118 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     You'd think that the makers of EDtv could take comfort in critic
Roger Ebert's dictum that "a movie isn't about what it's about, it's _how_
it's about what it's about."  The film is, after all, facing the daunting
task of following THE TRUMAN SHOW, a brilliant satire on the cult of
personality and loss of privacy in the mass media age.  EDtv, the
filmmakers could argue, is about some of those same themes in a different
way.  This one is about why people choose to be famous, and what they give
up along the way.  Sure, like THE TRUMAN SHOW it's about a man's life
turned into 24-hour entertainment, but director Ron Howard could still
make the claim that EDtv is unique.
     And he'd be right, for all the worst possible reasons.  EDtv is a
shallow and jokey rendering of its subject, a toothless satire that fades
before the last punchline.  The titular protagonist is Ed Pekurny (Matthew
McConaughey), an under-motivated and under-employed 31-year-old video
store clerk who auditions for a cable network's radical new broadcasting
concept.  True-TV's program director Cynthia Topping (Ellen DeGeneres)
wants to turn a man's life into a live, un-edited "reality" program, and
good-looking Everyman Ed is her choice.  Amazingly, "EDtv" the show
becomes a must-see hit, particularly when Ed becomes romantically involved
with Shari (Jenna Elfman), the girlfriend of his brother Ray (Woody
Harrelson).  Will fame and fortune keep Ed from the chance for true love,
corrupting his values the way we all know media can?
     Hard to say, since we're not exactly to privvy to what Ed's values
were in the first place.  As played with drawling nonchalance by Matthew
McConaughey, Ed is nearly bereft of an identifiable personality.  The
closest Lowell Ganz & Babaloo Mandel's script comes to defining Ed is
suggesting that he's basically a lazy simpleton who figures he can hit the
big time by becoming a celebrity without doing any actual work.  Trouble
is, that kind of personality wouldn't instantly endear Ed either to his
televsion audience or to us, so instead he's made a nice-guy rascal who
scratches himself jes' like reg'lar folks.  In short, he's a bore, as the
subject of a television show and the subject of a feature film.
     Even with a lackluster leading man, EDtv might have worked if there
had been any spark to its satire.  How very bizarre to watch it instead
morph into a kind of a meta-commentary on its own mass media
sentibilities.  As "EDtv" becomes a phenomenon, we watch a parade of
celebrities offer cameo commentary on Ed-mania:  Ariana Huffington, George
Plimpton, filmmaker Michael Moore, Jay Leno, Bill Maher, etc.  EDtv often
aims to score points simply by trotting out famous faces, then finds no
irony in a film about fame-for-fame's-sake which includes zingers from
RuPaul.  Even the endless series of advertisements on "EDtv" feels more
self-serving than sardonic; aside from the clever use of a Trojans ad
during one of Ed's romantic trysts, they feel like someone trying to have
his product placement cake and eat it too.
     EDtv still manages to be sporadically amusing, thanks largely to the
gag-meister sit-com style of Ganz and Mandel.  Martin Landau turns in a
sharp supporting performance as Ed's wheelchair-bound stepfather, and
Howard comes up with a couple of nicely-observed touches like the viewing
parties that pop up around Ed's first on-air sex.  In general, though, Ron
Howard is a sentimentalist with about as much edginess as a Teletubbie.
He's more interested in making EDtv a fairly generic romanctic comedy than
in digging into the reasons behind Americans' video voyeurism, or
examining how, in a post-modernist twist, our awareness of "reality"
television has made reality just as staged as drama.  In the end, EDtv
really is about the subject of mass media in its own way.  It's about how
much easier it is to let the viewers feel good than it is to tell them
what they need to hear.

Author
Mac VerStandig
See other reviews by Mac VerStandig at http://www.moviereviews.org
As the 21st century rapidly approaches, much is being made about the 
public's obsession with material that is, to put it frankly, none of 
it's business. The stories that attract America's attention for the 
longest periods of time have not been the cold war's termination, 
fleeing refugees from 3rd world countries or even the state of the 
union. Albeit that those are all issues that get a fair amount 
attention, the larger coverage is given to stories like the assault of a 
fellow skater that was linked to Tonya Harding, the trial of O. J. 
Simpson, and the relationship between a certain world leader and a young 
intern. It can be argued that this is due to people's need for 
knowledge that they are not the only ones with imperfections, and there 
are others with even greater dilemmas. But whatever the cause, there 
seems to be little more that the public enjoys, as the latest Ron Howard 
film, Edtv demonstrates, than being able to turn on the television or 
pick up a newspaper and see, hear or read about someone else's 
problems.
Ed Pekurny (Mathew McConaughey) is little more than your average guy 
with real world problems. He is about 30 years old, single and has an 
ordinary job at the local video store. His role model is Burt Reynolds, 
and yet the two seem to have little in common. His father left him when 
he was 12, and his mother lives with his step father, Al (Martin 
Landau), who raised him for all intensive purposes. His older brother, 
Ray (Woody Harrelson) is very similar to Ed but features a far more 
attractive life with six month girlfriend, Shari (Jenna Elfman).
On the other side of the ball there is Cynthia (Ellen DeGeneres) and Dr. 
Whitaker (Rob Reiner) who are both executives at a documentary based 
television network. They are wealthy and don't face problems similar 
to Ed's, but rather one major issue, that of slumping ratings. As of 
late, their network has been doing so bad that it actually lost out to 
"the Gardening Channel." Cynthia has a plan that will either bring them 
back to the top, or lose it all. The risk is major, but she is confident 
that if you put one person on television and follow every moment of 
their life, people will watch.
Of course, Ed is selected as the one and agrees. This process is most 
predictable and often is actually boring to watch. However, that soon 
ends when the great television experiments begins and "coincidentally" 
things start to become interesting. (A typical Hollywood touch to a film 
of this nature.)
Mathew McConaughey is less than stellar in his lead role. Often upstaged 
by Woody Harrelson, Martin Landau, Jenna Elfman, and even in a cameo by 
Dennis Hopper, his performance is most ironic as it often resembles a 
poorly acted television drama. One scene in particular features him with 
a love interest where his every move seems staged leading up to the soon 
to be stolen kiss. Other scenes are remarkably similar, but they are 
supposed to be staged to some degree, so it is harder to assign blame to 
McConaughey alone for them.
Fortunately, the supporting cast is absolutely brilliant. As the movie 
takes turns towards the melodramatic, and becomes more and more 
predictable, they seem to be the only saving grace in scene after scene. 
Ellen DeGeneres in particular stands out as someone who could have 
easily overplayed her role, but instead chose to turn in a refreshingly 
smart performance. At one point she has what is scripted as a break down 
type scene at a conference table, that could have very easily not only 
ruined her job, but Reiner's as well. However, instead of going for 
the over used Hollywood effect of over the top acting, she keeps it very 
light and actually makes a very good statement in doing so.
Despite the fine ensemble acting minus McConaughey, Edtv has a major 
flaw that reaches far beyond one poor performance. The movie has a very 
black and white message that is an opposition to scandalous 
entertainment, in particular it uses the given example of a man's life 
on television. The problem with that is 90% of the entertainment in this 
film does not come from the scenes focussing around this 24-hours a day 
documentary, but rather from us watching the man on television. So, 
despite sending a heavy message against the monitoring of other lives 
for entertainment, the movie relies on that very concept.
However, the question must be posed if the film itself is at fault for 
this. After all, almost all movies rely on the life and times of one 
person, fictional or real, as their main source of entertainment. But 
when a comparison is drawn to The Truman Show, an earlier release about 
a similar situation, you realize that films like this can be done 
tastefully. And you also realize that most films focussing on an 
individual, do so in a less scandalous and more pure fashion.
A realization must be made though. And that is that the public does seem 
to enjoy this type of "real life" trash. We may not want to admit it, 
and we may know that it is wrong, but we do like seeing other people's 
flaws. And this movie is masterful at doing that. It pokes fun in a way 
that is absolutely hysterical and keeps you interested for the two 
hours.
So, overall Edtv has some positives and negatives. The acting is good; 
but that is countered by one central performance that is horrendous. The 
message is very moralistic and delivered in an enjoyable fashion; but 
that is countered by a contradiction that undermines the entire film. 
Ultimately I did enjoy this film, as I have enjoyed the various scandals 
of the past few years. But I never gave my approval to OJ, or Tonya, or 
Monica, and I don't plan on starting here.

Author
Jon Popick
PLANET SICK-BOY: http://www.sick-boy.com
Ron Howard's latest film has the misfortune of following the superior
Oscar-nominated The Truman Show.  The similarities are numerous, and
when the inevitable comparisons are made, EdTV comes up short.  Really
short.
The reason Truman was such a great movie was because Truman was
completely unaware that he was being filmed.  When we saw people tuning
into Truman's life on a regular basis, we thought `Cripes!  This is
really messed up.  This guy's whole life has been a big charade and
these horrible people are using him to entertain themselves.  Media
bad.  Society doomed.'  Andrew Niccol's script was clever, dark and
preyed on mankind's paranoid fear both of being secretly watched and of
being a pawn in an intricate scheme to have the wool pulled over its
collective eyes.
EdTV's script, by Billy Crystal's crap-factory writing team of Lowell
Ganz & Babaloo Mandel, doesn't have that edge.  It features a guy, Ed
Pekurny (Matthew McConaughey, A Time to Kill) that knows he's being
watched by millions of people.  He even had to audition for the part.
So, basically, it's like watching MTV's The Real World except that it
concentrates on one person.  And that it's duller and more predictable.
Like Truman, Ed's real father (Dennis Hopper, Speed) tries to reunite
with his now-famous son.  Like Truman, the shows producers try to veer
Ed away from the plain-Jane girl he really loves (Jenna Elfman, Dharma &
Greg) toward a gorgeous ratings-grabber (Elizabeth Hurley, My Favorite
Martian).  And like Truman, there's even a scene where Ed, arms
outstretched, looks up into the sky as rain beats down on him.  Jeez, I
think I'm going to go rent Truman right now.  (2:02  PG-13 for adult
language, adult situations and some sexual content)

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director:   Ron Howard
Cast:  Matthew McConaughey, Jenna Elfman, Ellen DeGeneres, Woody
Harrelson, Martin Landau, Sally Kirkland, Rob Reiner, Dennis Hopper,
Elizabeth Hurley
Screenplay:  Lowell Ganz, Babaloo Mandel
Producers:  Brian Grazer, Ron Howard
Runtime:  123 min. 
US Distribution: Universal
Rated PG-13:  sex, partial nudity, language
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
EDtv is a satire so bland and toothless that I had trouble figuring out
the target of its criticism.  It's not a bad film -- it's elevated by a
few excellent performances, and there are several funny moments.  But
EDtv wants to be a satire at the core, and it just isn't effective.  And
with The Truman Show still strong in our memories, it's hard to imagine
another film on the same subject that measures up in any way.  Perhaps I
would have been easier on EDtv had it come out before Truman, but it
didn't, and I won't.
Ron Howard has made some good movies, and I can see how he thought this
one was going to be something special.  The film begins with Rob Reiner
as the president of a cable TV station; we see him telling a group of
reporters that they're planning a new kind of television show -- "True
TV."  He brings in the programming director, Cynthia Topping (Ellen
DeGeneres), to give the details of the show:  they're going to have
cameras on some average guy, twenty four hours a day, seven days a
week.  Uncut.  Unscripted.  Commercial-free.  And they think everyone
will watch.
The lucky man is Ed Pekurny, played by the affable Matthew
McConaughey.  Ed is a video store clerk of moderate intelligence, but
he's a pretty nice guy overall.  His family is more colorful than he is,
though:  his mother (Sally Kirkland) is an unstable, superficial woman
who somehow manages to be likable.  Her husband, Al (Martin Landau), is
Ed's stepfather, and he's bound to a wheelchair.  Ed's brother is Ray
(Woody Harrelson), a hot-blooded moron.  Ray is dating Shari (Jenna
Elfman); Ray isn't very nice to her, and so Shari and Ed end up getting
together.  
One of the several conflicts is pretty obvious without even seeing the
film -- Ed is first going to soak up the fame, just before realizing
that he hates it and wants his private life back.  There's going to be a
big problem with Shari.  And, naturally, the Evil Corporation won't let
him out of the show due to some ridiculous fine print on a contract he
signed.  If EDtv had defied my expectations by creating a more
interesting conflict, it would have been a better film.  But the overall
story is tedious and unimpressive, and so the individual moments that
work are forced to stand alone.
Here's a note to all film makers planning to make a film that satirizes
the television industry:  we know that the media intrudes on our private
lives.  We know that they're all just a bunch of money-grubbing jerks. 
We know that Fame is a double-edged sword.  If you're going to make a
movie that tries to tell us these things, you need to be vicious (see
Network) or artistically sublime (see The Truman Show).  Howard seems
way too concerned with the human story to actually put any bite into the
satire, and so the film's focus is skewed.  The human story is too goofy
to be truly engaging, and the Rob Reiner character is too unbelievably
mean to avoid looking like a cartoon (thus thwarting the satire).
But the film is not without its pleasures, most of them lying in the
performances .  Ellen DeGeneres is a wonderful comedic presence, and
squeezes laughs out of every scene (especially the one in which she
resigns from the station).  Jenna Elfman is utterly believable and
sympathetic as Shari, and I just want to hug her whenever she's on
screen.   Landau is also wonderful as the stepfather Al, and Kirkland
does a good job by his side.  And McConaughey, while he's no Harrison
Ford, makes a good, amiable protagonist.  
But EDtv ultimately whimpers to a close.  One of the film's themes, I
think, is that our lives are all worthy of soap opera-status.  But the
story in EDtv is too goofy and complex to take seriously, even though
it's clear that Howard wants us to take it seriously by the end.  And
the satire doesn't work because it never reaches an acceptable level of
bitterness.  In the end, EDtv is just another mediocre swing at
greatness.  You might find it enjoyable while it's running, but a week
later you probably won't even remember its name, let alone the target of
its ridicule.  

Author
Matt Williams
Instant fame is a dream of many, but at what cost does it come?
Director Ron Howard's latest film, Ed TV, takes a critical look at the
price of celebrity.  This comedy doesn't pack as hefty a punch as it
hopes for, but it is often funny enough that it doesn't matter.
TrueTV is a cable network in search of a gimmick, and, after a
brainstorm, programming executive Cynthia (Ellen DeGeneres) believes she
has found one. The network will broadcast the life of an average
American, live and uncut, 24 hours a day.
After a nationwide search, the lucky winner is Ed Pekurny (Matthew
McConaughey), a video store clerk in San Francisco.  Talked into the
gimmick by his brother Ray (Woody Harrelson), Ed thinks that gaining
instant fame will be fun.
But, after a while, the lack of privacy starts to sink home.  As Ed
becomes a celebrity, cracks begin to appear in his previously stable
family.  First, Ed begins an affair with Ray's girlfriend, Shari (Jenna
Elfman). Soon, long buried family secrets begin to surface, and Ed
desperately searches for a way out.
On first glance, Ed TV seems to sound an awful lot like last year's The
Truman Show.  Both films do feature 24-hour tv shows revolving around
the life of one man. In fact, both movies feature nearly the same
reaction shots of "typical" members of the television audience.
However, whereas The Truman Show was analyzing the boundaries between
reality and entertainment, Ed TV is more interested in examining the
culture of celebrity.
Though Ed TV's criticisms about the ultimate cost of fame ring true, the
underlying concept of a popular 24-hour channel devoted to Ed just
doesn't seem plausible.  An edited show, maybe...but in today's instant
gratification culture, it's hard to imagine a show where days or weeks
would pass before something actually happens.
But, with several months compressed into a two-hour film, there's hardly
a lack of activity in the movie, Ed TV.  In fact, it begins to seem odd
that so many big and important events occur in Ed's life during these
few months.  A few of the moments seem a bit too scripted (the cat
scene, for one), but nearly all are enjoyable.
Ed TV does certainly have a stellar cast.  In addition to those
mentioned above, Rob Reiner, Dennis Hopper, Elizabeth Hurley and Sally
Kirkland also star.  In the film's most enjoyable role, Martin Landau
shines as Al, Ed's stepfather.  He simply steals every scene he's in.
The conclusion of Ed TV feels a bit rushed.  The heretofore amiable
network all of a sudden is painted as pure evil.  But, even if the
wrapup lacks dramatic weight, the movie delivers quite a good time
getting there.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Author
Luke Buckmaster
EDTV
Cast: Matthew McConaughey, Jenna Elfman, Ellen DeGeneres, Woody
Harrelson, Martin Landau, Sally Kirkland, Rob Reiner, Dennis Hopper,
Elizabeth Hurley
Director: Ron Howard
Screenplay: Lowell Ganz & Babaloo Mandel
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
2 and a half stars
Even though it's been about twenty years since Ron Howard starred in
'Happy Days,' I still giggle after reading the words "a Ron Howard
film."  There's just something about picturing Ritchie Cunningham
directing a Hollywood blockbuster that you can't help but laugh at.
Howard's new movie EDtv will inevitably be compared to Peter Weir's film
The Truman Show, which has similar themes.  But whereas Truman focused
on a character who was oblivious to his world-wide fame as a star of his
own TV show, the protagonist in EDtv eagerly volunteers himself for a
media experiment, only to realize that perhaps it wasn't such a good
idea.  Howard has proved himself more than capable of handling heavy
material after the successes of Apollo 13 and Ransom, but here he
doesn't manage to direct with the kind of cynical detachment that made
Weir's piece succeed so well.
After two years worth of bad ratings, cable television channel 'True TV'
decides to try something different.  Headed by program director Cynthia
Topping (Ellen DeGeneres), they plan to create a show that follows, for
24 hours a day, the life of an average Joe.  Enter Ed Pekurny (Matthew
McConaughey), who is the perfect loser they are looking for.  Thus,
'EDtv' is born.  Sure enough, a camera crew follows Ed everywhere he
goes, and it doesn't take long before Ed's life becomes a lot more
complicated.  Trouble arises when he catches his brother Ray (Woody
Harrelson) having an affair on national TV, which leaves Ray's
girlfriend Shari (Jenna Elfman) predictably furious.  Shari and Ed are
attracted to each other and carve a relationship of their own, whilst
Ed's long-lost father Hank (Dennis Hopper) arrives on the scene and
causes domestic problems with Ed's flamboyant mother Janette (Sally
Kirkland).
If cameras didn't follow Ed everywhere, I'd swear that this was just
another average drama.  At least that's the way that Howard approaches
his material; instead of focusing on the media's influence on society,
he merely gives a twist to a typical domestic story.  Most frustrating
in his direction is his lack of attention to interesting themes.  When
Ed experiences his fifteen minutes of fame, it's clear that he is no
longer an average citizen, and thus 'True TV' loses the very thing that
made it so popular - its ability to follow an ordinary, fame-less
citizen.  But the 'True TV' executives are just as oblivious to this as
Howard is.  He obviously wanted to keep the film simplistic and able to
succeed on its own entertaining merits, thus much intrigue is lost.
Edtv consistently tries to persuade its audience that Ed is a character
who deserves to be barracked for.  Matthew McConaughey mouths his
dialogue with the kind of Southern American simplicity that quickly
becomes irritating, and although there is nothing drastically wrong with
his performance, the film's script doesn't have the strength to support
him.  Ed succeeds as a likeable nice guy, but hardly somebody who will
have you cheering in the aisles (unlike Truman, who's portrayal by Jim
Carrey made him impossible not to like).
EDtv is entertaining and sometimes quite funny - after all, this is A
Ron Howard Film.  But the media-induced world in which the film's
characters revolve in is not the unrelentingly cold world we know.  The
only time I was truly engaged by EDtv was near its completion, when Ed
realizes the horror of being stripped of privacy.  This diminishes, of
course, into an expected happy ending in which everybody departs the set
smiling, but most cinema-goers will leave only with a taste of what
could have been.  EDtv is largely an ineffective film that is hard to
hate but easy to forget.  Not bad for entertainment value, but don't
look for anything profound in Howard's light-hearted direction.


Author
David N. Butterworth
        When I first saw the previews for Ron Howard's latest film, my
expectations were discouragingly low.  A show about nothing?  Sounds like
"Seinfeld."  A guy whose entire life is broadcast 24 hours a day?  Sounds
like "The Truman Show."  What is it with Hollywood that no sooner than one
production company puts out an animated feature about ants, another puts
one out about bugs?
        Which is why I was pleasantly surprised by "EdTV," which turns out
to be a fresh, insightful, and often times hilarious film about the follies
of instant celebrity.
        The writing, by Howard's longtime collaborators Lowell Ganz and
Babaloo Mandel, is right on the money and Howard himself should be credited
for giving the subject matter a fresh focus.  In the hands of a
less-experienced director, "EdTV" could easily have had all the flavor of
yesterday's meatloaf.
        With their 'True TV' cable ratings being threatened by 'The
Gardening Channel' (apparently people would rather watch soil), the
NorthWest Broadcasting Company is looking for a novel concept to attract
viewers.  Program Director Cynthia Topping (Ellen DeGeneres) comes up with
the idea of putting a nobody on the air and broadcasting his every waking
and sleeping moment.  The hook is to find a regular guy, someone normal
that people can relate to.  While scouting possible candidates, Cynthia's
camera crew discover Ed Pekurny and his pig brother Ray (Woody Harrelson)
in a bar, where Ray believes he has what it takes for his fifteen plus
minutes of fame.  But on watching the videotape, the show's producers are
more taken with Ed than with Ray.  He's cute, he says all the wrong things,
and he's 100% USDA hick.
        Cynthia's boss, played by Rob Reiner, gives the show a week to
deliver the goods and it's tough going in the early stages.  The most
exciting thing that happens is Ed brushes his teeth.  "Action shot!" wags
one of the production assistants when a couple of Pop Tarts jump out of the
toaster.  You get the idea.
        But soon enough, things--Nielsen-boosting kinds of things--start to
happen to this unassuming San Francisco video store clerk and the 'True TV'
cameras are right there to document it.  Ed's privacy is no longer his own,
his newfound fame starts having a negative impact on his family life, and
what little dignity he has left is trampled on by the media.  Who should Ed
go out with?  You can be sure the pollsters have a list.
        Not only is the film exceedingly well cast, but its performers are
consistently excellent.  Matthew McConaughey provides the face, the body
language, and the lovable Texan accent to fill the shoes of America's
latest phenomenon.  He and Harrelson look like they really could be
brothers.  Sally Kirkland is noteworthy in a difficult role as Ed's mother,
and Martin Landau is one of the film's highlights as Al, Ed's ailing
stepfather.  Jenna Elfman (from TV's "Dharma and Greg") proves herself
surprisingly worthy in the company of Kirkland and Landau, although those
Alpine eyebrows of hers get a little distracting.  Even DeGeneres and
Reiner are better than you'd expect.
        In 1979, writer/director/comedian Albert Brooks made a zany little
film called "Real Life" in which a small-time opportunist makes a real-time
documentary about a typical American family.  The scenes of Ed's family
sitting around the dinner table feasting on Kentucky Fried Chicken and
waxing idiotic play like a big-budget variant on that film, paralleling its
wickedly inventive humor.  As with most films by Albert Brooks, "Real Life"
was funny, but absurd.  The funniest--and scariest--thing about "EdTV" is
that it is absolutely believable.

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
EDtv (1999)
Matthew McConaughey, Jenna Elfman, Woody Harrelson, Ellen DeGeneres, 
Sally Kirkland, Martin Landau, Elizabeth Hurley, Rob Reiner, Dennis 
Hopper, Adam Goldberg, Viveka Davis, Clint Howard, Don Most. Written by 
Lowell Ganz and Babaloo Mandel, based on Michel Poulette's film "Le Roi 
des Ondes" ("King of the Airwaves"). Directed by Ron Howard. 122 minutes.
Rated PG-13, 3 stars (out of five stars)
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott, NUVO Newsweekly
www.nuvo-online.com
Archive reviews at
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Edward+Johnson-ott
To receive reviews by e-mail at no charge, send subscription requests to 
pbbp24a@prodigy.com 
When presenting her idea for a 24 hour a day TV show following a real 
person through his unscripted life, a network executive explains that her 
brainchild will be live and unedited, thus separating it from PBS' 
notorious documentary "An American Family" and MTV's "The Real World." 
Had I written the script, she would have added, "And it's not like 'The 
Truman Show' either. Our star will be a volunteer with a lot more 
charisma than Truman Burbank."
"EDtv" blends comedy and drama while exploring the lure of fame and the 
perverse contemporary mystique surrounding celebrities. The story suffers 
from unrealistic plot developments towards the end and fails to carry its 
theme through to its logical conclusion, but entertains nonetheless, 
thanks primarily to a deft performance from Matthew McConaughey. As 31 
year old video clerk Ed Pekurny, McConaughey is just terrific, making Ed 
a thoroughly likable doofus stud.
Ed may be a slacker, but he's a cagey one. Asked by the network about his 
drawl, he explains, "I can get rid of this Texas accent whenever I want, 
or I can slide real deep into it just like this. As a rule, it's helpful 
with the ladies." He is remarkably relaxed around the camera, casually 
studying his fanny in one early scene and, later, addressing friends 
directly by talking into the lens. His self-awareness and lack of self-
consciousness makes for a winning combination. When director Ron Howard 
cuts to shots of representative viewers who are hooked on the program, 
you understand why. In fact, "EDtv" the show is considerably more 
enjoyable than "EDtv" the movie.
"EDtv" the show is packed with colorful characters, family histrionics, 
big laughs, high drama and just the right amount of vulgarity. I'd watch 
it in a heartbeat; to catch up on the love triangle between Ed, Shari 
(Jenna Elfman) and big-brother Ray (Woody Harrelson); to hear the latest 
one-liners from Al (Martin Landau), Ed's lovable scene-stealing step-
father; or to witness mother Jeanette (Sally Kirkland) frantically doing 
spin-control when Ed's long-missing father Hank (Dennis Hopper) reappears 
and drops some bombshells about the circumstances surrounding his 
departure. Hell, Ed's fun even during his down time. When he awakens 
sporting morning wood, will he remember the camera is there, or forget 
and allow his hand to slide down his drawers? Voyeurism may be tacky, but 
the truth is that most of you would watch as well.  
"EDtv" the movie is far less engaging. Ron Howard inserts too many ironic 
winks about the decidedly mixed blessings of celebrity, from soundtrack 
lyric references ("Thank you for letting me be myself," "Be careful what 
you wish for") to visual underlining (Shari tries to escape the cameras 
by ducking into a theater playing the film "Solitude"). Enough, Ron, we 
get it! 
Some of the inside gags succeed. After her well-publicized war with ABC, 
it's a kick seeing Ellen DeGeneres play a network executive. Shots of a 
TV talk show where commentators condemn "EDtv" as "a new low in 
broadcasting" work because the panelists, including "TV Nation" vets 
Michael Moore and Merrill Markoe, are not exactly strangers to video 
vulgarity in real life.
Unfortunately, the story takes some wrong turns. When Ed and Shari have a 
spat, the network inserts a cheesy femme fatale straight out of "Melrose 
Place." Ed would not be stupid enough to hook up with this patent phony, 
even for a night. Later, when Ed gets fed up with celebrity life, network 
officials refuse to release him from his contract, leading to a 
needlessly contrived finale.
In real-life, no network official would willingly appear on-camera as a 
villain. Instead, as soon as the show proved successful, they would 
anticipate the inevitable end of the series and be ready to begin 
"SARAHtv" or "MIKEtv" at a moment's notice. As opposed to the ending of 
the film, which I will not reveal, imagine this. The network releases Ed 
from his contract and continues the concept with a new subject. For a 
while, Ed savors his privacy, not to mention all the money. Then the cash 
runs out, he begins to miss the attention and eventually ends up pleading 
in vain for a sequel series. Such a resolution might be on the dour side, 
but if Howard really wants to explore the arc fame generally follows, it 
would be far more realistic and resonant than the film's tidy ending. 
Perhaps Ron Howard, by all reports a level-headed and decent man despite 
his life-long celebrity status, is just too clean-cut for this subject 
matter. Good for Ron, bad for us. As is, "EDtv" serves as breezy, 
disposable entertainment, but only skims the surface of its own dark 
waters.

Author
Susan Granger
Subject: Susan Granger's review of "ED tv"
Approved: graham@ee.washington.edu
X-Questions-to: movie-rev-mod@www.ee.washington.edu
X-Submissions-to: movie-reviews@www.ee.washington.edu
Followup-To: rec.arts.movies.current-films
Summary: r.a.m.r. #17370
Keywords: author=granger
Newsgroups: rec.arts.movies.reviews
Organization: None
Author: Ssg722@aol.com (Susan Granger)
http://www.speakers-podium.com/susangranger.
Susan Granger's review of "ED TV" (Universal Pictures)
We're obviously a nation besotted with celebrity, fame, and
seeing ourselves on TV. If you doubt it, watch the crowds that gather
outside NBC in Rockefeller Center every morning to wave and mug for
the "Today" show cameras. "ED tv" is about a goofy, ordinary guy from
Texas - Matthew McConaughey - who is catapulted to instant success
when his photogenic face is spotted by "True TV" producer Ellen
DeGeneres, who is determined to air someone "live" on cable 24
hours-a-day.  From video store clerk to TV star in days...is that the
new American Dream?  Unlike "The Truman Show," in which Jim Carrey was
the unwitting dupe, or "Pleasantville," in which two teenagers get
stuck in a '50s sit-com, the star of "ED tv" succumbs to the
aphrodisiac of fame, volunteering to give up his dignity for the
spotlight. After discussing it with his family (Woody Harrelson,
Martin Landau, Sally Kirkland) McConaughey gamely allows cameras
installed in his apartment to record his every move (except in the
bathroom) and tries to ignore the three-man crew dogging his steps -
until he falls in love with his brother's girl-friend, Jenna Elfman
(who resembles a wannabe Renee Zellweger). Only when she resents the
constant intrusion does McConaughey realize what celebrity and the
sacrifice of privacy really mean - but, by that time, the audience has
become addicted to watching his "life" unfold. Written by Lowell Ganz
and Babaloo Mandel ("Parenthood," "City Slickers") and directed by Ron
Howard ("Ransom," "Apollo 13"), "ED tv" is a relentlessly
entertaining, cleverly comical satire of our American obsession with
the limelight. On the Granger Movie Gauge of 1 to 10, "ED tv" is an
engaging, delightful 8, focusing on people who are considered special
just for being famous.

Author
Akiva Gottlieb
rated PG-13
starring Matthew McConaughey, Jenna Elfman, Ellen DeGeneres, Woody
Harrelson, Martin Landau, Sally Kirkland, Rob Reiner, Dennis Hopper,
Elizabeth Hurley, Clint Howard, Adam Goldberg
written by Lowell Ganz and Babaloo Mandel
based on the screenplay for LOUIS 19, LE ROI DES ONDES by Emile
Gaudreault and Sylvie Bouchard
directed by Ron Howard
Would you ever want a camera crew following you around 24 hours a day,
filming everything you do? If you gave any thought at all to it, my
guess is you'd say no. But Ed Kearney (Matthew McConaughey) in Ron
Howard's comedy EDtv doesn't give that much thought to anything.
Ed is a thirtysomething video store clerk who gets pushed into the
national spotlight when he agrees to star in a show called TrueTV, in
which a film crew would follow him around 24 hours a day. His brother,
Ray (Woody Harrelson, who could pass for McConaughey's brother in real
life), loves the idea because he can get free publicity for his new
gym. Ray's girlfriend Shari (a very good Jenna Elfman) finds out that
Ray is cheating on her when Ed and his cameras go to visit him, and
she realizes that it was Ed she wanted all along. But camera-shy Shari
can't stand all the attention she's getting and comes across as a
bitch on the show (according to 71% of USA Today readers).  Along with
Ed, we also find out hidden secrets about his family. And when Shari
ditches Ed and the cameras and moves away, the dimwitted Ed realizes
that the show has turned his life into a claustrophobic mess. One show
executive (Ellen DeGeneres) decides then to give the show some
excitement by sending out a woman (Elizabeth Hurley) to seduce Ed. By
then, Ed is a national phenomenon, and a few thousand people wait
outside the woman's apartment to cheer Ed on. When the night turns
into a mess, Ed finally confronts head studio executive (Rob Reiner)
and demands to be set free. But then the executive reminds him of the
contract he signed that says that he can be filmed for as long as the
studio would like to film him. Then the film takes a funny satirical
twist as Ed tries to get his simple life back to normal.
EDtv is not nearly as significant as the film that it will be compared
to time and time again, THE TRUMAN SHOW. In the few times that I saw
THE TRUMAN SHOW, I actually dismissed it as another overrated
Hollywood attempt at greatness.  But EDtv actually made me see what
made THE TRUMAN SHOW so special. It had a social significance and
portrayed Truman's world so satirically well. I'm not saying, though,
that EDtv is a bad movie. Infact, I may have enjoyed it more than THE
TRUMAN SHOW. It is funny, smart and entertaining, and it doesn't leave
as many unanswered questions as THE TRUMAN SHOW. But sometimes the
film gets lost, often forgetting what it's there to do. To prove (like
THE TRUMAN SHOW) that television, above all, is just a bunch of crap.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://www.angelfire.com/mo/film
watch me on TBS' "Dinner And A Movie" May 21, 8:05pm EST


Author
Dustin Putman
Directed by Ron Howard.
Cast: Matthew McConaughey, Jenna Elfman, Woody Harrelson, Ellen 
DeGeneres, Rob Reiner, Sally Kirkland, Martin Landau, Adam Goldberg, 
Elizabeth Hurley, Dennis Hopper, Clint Howard, Viveka Davis, Jennifer 
Elise Cox.
1999 - 120 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity, brief nudity, and sexual situations).
Reviewed March 28, 1999.
Usually you can tell when you are watching a Ron Howard film, since they 
all have many things in common, including a large cast of characters put 
into a slick, smart screenplay that is enjoyable while at the same time 
always taking the "safe" route. And aside from his landmark motion 
picture from 1989, "Parenthood," Howard has never really proven to be a 
great filmmaker, but surely a good one. "Ed TV" is no exception, as it 
takes a premise that is similar to last year's more thought-provoking, 
superior Peter Weir drama, "The Truman Show" (a man who is being taped 
24 hours a day and watched by all of America), but does not come off as 
any sort of rip-off since there are a few vital differences: Ed, unlike 
Truman, knows and agrees to be taped, and its overall mood relies more 
on comedy than drama, even though there are a few subtle, poignant 
moments that surprisingly do pack a wallop.
Ed (Matthew McConaughey) is a 31-year-old video store clerk living in 
San Francisco who, by chance, is seen by a cable television station, 
Real TV, that is interviewing people for the arduous, but well-paying, 
job of having their lives taped around the clock. Ed's show-off older 
brother, Ray (Woody Harrelson), was actually the one auditioning, but it 
is Ed who catches the eye of program director Cynthia Topping (a 
scene-stealing Ellen DeGeneres). After a brief meeting, Ed is hired, and 
his family, including his mother (Sally Kirkland) and wheelchair-bound 
stepfather (Martin Landau), are somewhat cautious but nonetheless see it 
as a way for Ed to get out of his dead-end job at the video store. The 
show starts off rockily as the first image viewers see is of Ed waking 
up and scratching his privates, but ratings start to pick up when it is 
discovered on national television that Ray is cheating on his sweety-pie 
fiancee, Shari (Jenna Elfman), and Ed's true feelings come out when he 
ends up comforting, and then ultimately kissing, her. Quickly, being on 
television constantly begins to put an inevitable strain on their very 
unprivate relationship, and Shari becomes discouraged to find that many 
viewers think Ed could do a lot better than her.
The entertainment value of "Ed TV" is due, in part, by its intriguing 
storyline, as well as in its voyeuristic approach to the subject matter 
of someone's life being constantly recorded (save for when they go to 
the bathroom). In its first, and arguably most successful, half, is when 
most time is given to this simple quality, as we follow Ed around in his 
everyday life, as well as in his blossoming romance with Shari. 
Hampering the second half, even though it brings up several thoughtful 
statements about the price famous people have to pay, is a distracting 
subplot that comes about in the form of bombshell model, Jill (Elizabeth 
Hurley), who has obviously been hired to spice up Ed's love life. As the 
big night that America is awaiting arrives, when Ed is supposed to sleep 
with Jill, I had a difficult time believing that the caring Ed would do 
such a thing. Although Ed learns a vital piece of information about the 
media afterwards, Hurley is wasted in a needlessly one-dimensional role, 
and a whole minor storyline that could have been completely discarded. 
Fortunately, the film's final half-hour made a comeback from the 
penultimate section, with Ed discovering some shocking news about his 
family's history while trying to rekindle the flame with Shari, who 
still loves him. 
In his first starring role in 1996's "A Time to Kill," Matthew 
McConaughey became a full-fledged star, but since then hasn't been able 
to come back with another totally satisfying role, until now. Unlike 
some of these recent pretty-boy actors who have become stars not 
necessarily because of talent, but because of looks (ahem, Brad Pitt), 
McConaughey has the acting chops to be successful, and with "Ed TV," I 
hope he makes his breakthrogh. Appropriately toned down from her giddy 
character on ABC's "Dharma and Greg," Jenna Elfman is a fresh face whom 
has a genuine innocence about her that works well with the screen. 
Meanwhile, Sally Kirkland and Martin Landau are both effective as Ed's 
parents, Woody Harrelson is often annoying, but in a good way, as his 
brother, while Dennis Hopper, as Ed's real-life father, must have been 
hired for a day's worth of work. The standout in "Ed TV," amongst all of 
the other strong performances, however, is Ellen DeGeneres, who, to me, 
at least, finally comes into her own as an accomplished actress. Her 
character of Cynthia is more complex than it first appears, and she goes 
through several distinct character transformations, as she discovers 
what she has been doing is heartless and uncaring, with much of the 
blame going to the station's backstabbing boss (Rob Reiner). Also 
appreciated is that Cynthia is not portrayed as a one-liner comedian, 
since she is played by DeGeneres, but instead as a real person.
Even though I hate to compare them once again since they are only alike 
in the most basic terms, "Ed TV" lacks the overall profoundity that made 
"The Truman Show" one of the better motion pictures of last year. Coming 
away from "Ed TV," I had spent two hours with a group of people I liked, 
and had some fun with its story, but it really isn't a film that will 
strongly stick with you for a long period of time. Director Howard has 
once again created a respectable, intelligent film, but one, to be sure, 
that prospers more while in the individual moments, rather than one that 
remains deeply ingrained in your long-term memory. 

Author
Fox Davidson
  I have heard numerous speculations of the new Ron Howard movie, EDtv, as a
copycat of last year's overrated The Truman Show.  Well, having seen EDtv, I
can safely say, it is in no way at all like Truman.  EDtv is funnier and more
fun to watch the cast of talents, including Matthew McConaughy, Jenna Elfman,
Martin Landau, and Ellen DeGeneres.
  McConaughy stars as 31-year-old Ed Pukerny, a video store clerk whose life is
suddenly shot into fame when he is "cast" in his own 24 hour, seven days a week
television show called "ED-TV."  This is the brain-child (I hate that word,
but, oh well) of a TV production company producer (DeGeneres), whose studio has
suffered from lackluster ratings.  "The all-Garden channel is beating us.
People would rather watch soil" she says.
  After a couple of days of ED-TV, Ed becomes a national star, somewhat of a
real star: Being trashed in the tabloids and savaged by media news critics (one
played by Michael Moore, as, himself I think).  But, ED-TV also becomes a
target for his friends who don't particularly like being filmed 24-7. 
Especially Ed's brother's (the always great Woody Harrelson) fiancee, Shari
(Elfman).  And things get really stinky when Ed and Shari fall in love,
unintentionally displaying this to their millions of fans, and Ed's family.
  EDtv is somewhat more believable than Truman Show.  Not that it is likely we
will be seeing a real life Ed Pekurny soon.  But, I can definitely see that
happening faster that Truman's elaborate premise.  Look at The Real World,
however bad it is, it is still basically the same thing.  Truman was a fairly
involving movie, but, not wholely satisfying.  EDtv is very satisfying and
hilarious.  I especially liked the part when Ray, Ed's brother, gets drunk and
spills the beans on his family, everything from his sister being an alcholic to
her husband being a bad lounge singer, all to get a laugh.
  Howard, who also directed the funny Splash, has made a very well-done comedy.
It could also be looked as a satire on TV producers.  Either way, it is a
surprisingly touching, always funny film.

Author
Harvey S. Karten
 Reviewed by Harvey Karten, Ph.D.
 Universal Pictures/Imagine Entertainment
 Director:  Ron Howard
 Writer:  Lowell Ganz, Babaloo Mandel, on Michel Poulette's
film "Le Roi des Ondes" ("King of the Airwaves")
 Cast: Matthew McConaughey, Jenna Elfman, Woody
Harrelson, Ellen DeGeneres, Sally Kirkland, Martin Landau,
Elizabeth Hurley, Rob Reiner, Dennis Hopper
   In a film that is perfectly watchable but will probably
disappear from audience memory within three hours of its
conclusion, "EDtv" takes off where "The Truman Show" and
"Pleasantville" left off.  Bearing none of the creative juices
that made the two 1998 films striking to viewers, "EDtv"
suffers from predictability, a narrow imagination, and a final
payoff that is so limp (literally so, in fact) that you'll wonder
how highly-paid screenwriters could fail to come up with a
more convincing outcome.  "Edtv" is about an ordinary guy
with a sexy Texan drawl and a goofy but photogenically
friendly face who is catapulted to prominence at the whim of
a TV producer and his program director.  
    A pundit who could have been inspired by Confucius or
Buddha once commented on the irony of such fame.  You
spend a good part of your youth trying to achieve it, he said,
and the rest of your life hiding from the public behind shades
and other disguises.  Celebrity status has its privileges but
exacts a price.  Your privacy is shot, you're hounded for
autographs wherever you go, and as Ron Silver pointed out
in the stage play "And," you cringe every time someone gets
into your face with the banal reflection, "I love your work."  In
"EDtv," which is based partially on a French movie which no
one has seen, "The King of the Airwaves," an ordinary Joe
Sixpack is offered fifteen metaphoric minutes of fame, goes
for the deal, but backs out with fourteen minutes to go in his
contract.  Just plain Ed (Matthew McConaughey) discovers
what most of us eventually will realize--that you shouldn't ask
too strongly for what you want: you may get it.  The
champagne  he swims in when he becomes king of the
airwaves turns to sour grapes when the public repeatedly
invades his privacy, undermines his dignity, causes a rift
between him and his brother, and even threatens to break up
the relationship  between his mother and the stepdad he
adores.
   Directed as a conventional narrative by Ron Howard--who
teams up with his regular scripters Lowell Ganz and Babaloo
Mandel)--"EDtv" opens on a meeting at a failing cable TV
network as program director Cynthia (Ellen DeGeneres)
works hard to convince her boss, Whitaker (Rob Reiner) to
air a show that might get a better rating than the local
Gardening Channel.  Inspired by an actual documentary
broadcast some twenty years ago by PBS about the Loud
family, Cynthia's idea is for a twenty-four hour coverage of an
ordinary American with no editing, no professional actors, and
no commercials save for a regular, printed bulletin at the
bottom of the screen touting a host of nationally-known
products.  The only provision for privacy is that the camera
would not enter the subject's bathroom and would refuse to
catch footage of his sexual activities.  After interviewing
several candidates for this last-ditch attempt at good ratings,
the network team goes with Ed Pekurny (Matthew
McConaughey), a goofy video store clerk in his early thirties
who lives in San Francisco and has the potential for national
appeal because of his openness, honesty, and vulnerability. 
After an unpromising introduction which features Ed engaging
in no more adventurous action shots than brushing his teeth,
the show picks up dramatically when its star makes a play for
his own brother's girl friend, Shari (Jenna Elfman), to the
obvious displeasure of Ed's sibling, Ray (Woody Harrelson). 
As people everywhere hound the new celebrity sensation for
autographs and as the ubiquitous cameras hone in on Ed's
relationship with his mother, his stepdad and his biological
father, Ed feels he is simply being used--that the network 
cares not a whit for the poor man's dignity but actually thrives
on his pratfalls, the family frictions and the wrenches the
ever-present camera people throw into his most intimate
relationships.
   Director Ron Howard may want to expose the evils of the
big bad media, but considering the sums of money promised
to the new star, we can hardly sympathize with Ed's
complaints.  Whereas the film could have shown us how the
corporations lead us on with bold promises of generous
treatment and then throw us away when we are used up,
we're treated to the very opposite concept: it is Ed, and not
the communications industry, who wants out.  The station is
not only willing but insistent on keeping its hero in the
national spotlight and showering him with bonuses.  And
where Howard may wish us to question our addiction to TV--
our compulsion to watch absolutely anything that moves
across the screen--he shows us a program which is so
dynamic, so vibrant and appealing, that you can't blame the
American people for staying glued to the screen.  Contrary to
the usual cynical notions about the tube, the program known
as EDtv is a quality offering that subtitutes honest emotions
and real love for the phony, soap-opera scripts of the daytime
lineups.  
  As a result, we're not clear what we're supposed to believe. 
Are we meant to feel that the public will feast on just anything
that crosses the screen, or that television can rescue itself
from banality by conjuring up unique programs like EDtv? 
Are the people who watch this show lampooned as folks
without standards, or are they praised for rejecting the usual,
unimaginative presentations in favor of something innovative?
   Working with a script that is conventional and lacking a
clear purpose, Matthew McConaughey turns in an impressive
performance as an often bemused Everyman, but the best
lines go to Martin Landau as stepdad Al, an infirm old man
confined to a wheelchair and dependent for oxygen on an
inhaler, who comes up with such dry-humored gems as "I've
got to take a pee...wish me luck."  But the gorgeous Elizabeth
Hurley in the role of Jill--who feigns an interest in Ed in order
to land a role as a model or actress--looks at the camera so
often when initiating a tryst that you wonder whether Ron
Howard trusts his audience to know her real motivation
unless she mugs for the lens in the most obvious way. 
Woody Harrelson's fine as Ed's envious brother, Ray, in the
sort of good-old-boy role that suits his temperament, but Ellen
DeGeneres, as program director Cynthia, is oddly meant to
come across in the final analysis as a hero when in fact she
is the one who initiates the indignities.  Watch Jenna Elfman
closely and speculate on whether she is doing her darndest
to clone Renee Zellweger.
   The artistic and commercial success of "The Truman
Show" and "Pleasantville" is bound to spawn additional
attempts to cash in, but as the first such bid "EdTV," is
entertaining but as it does not genuinely explore its
implications, it is bereft of anything that could elevate it to
something more.

Author
Michael Dequina
Much like how his character, Ed Pekurny, finds fame as the subject of a
24-hour "reality" cable network, Matthew McConaughey should find his
falling star back on the rise as the lead in _EDtv_, Ron Howard's amiable
goof of a comedy.  McConaughey is a charismatic charmer as Ed, a
Texas-to-San Francisco transplant whose life becomes fodder for the
TV-viewing masses, but unlike Truman Burbank in Peter Weir's
similarly-themed (and far superior) _The_Truman_Show_, Ed is fully aware
of the cameras.  But as with Truman, Ed, while initially intrigued with
the notion of having all eyes on him, comes to yearn for freedom,
especially after it creates strain between and his girlfriend Shari
(Jenna Elfman)--who, as it happens, is the ex of Ed's wilder older
brother Ray (Woody Harrelson).
Howard and screenwriters Lowell Ganz and Babaloo Mandel don't have the
high satirical aims of _Truman's_ Weir and writer Andrew Niccol; they
simply aim to entertain.  And after a tentative start, _EDtv_ picks up
comedic steam and does just that, amusingly exploring the ramifications
of Ed's sudden, if largely unmerited, celebrity, from opportunistic
groupies (Elizabeth Hurley's sizzling model/aspiring actress) to the
diminished privacy of his colorful family.  Harrelson is predictably
effective as a blowhard, and Elfman (Golden Globe winner for TV's
_Dharma_and_Greg_) shows major promise as a screen star, but the
McConaughey magnetism is so overwheming that the film could easily have
been called _MATTtv_.
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@iname.com   |  michael_jordan@geocities.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site: http://welcome.to/mrbrown
CompuServe Hollywood Hotline: http://www.HollywoodHotline.com___________________________________________________________________
You don't need to buy Internet access to use free Internet e-mail.
Get completely free e-mail from Juno at http://www.juno.com/getjuno.html
or call Juno at (800) 654-JUNO [654-5866]

Author
Bob Bloom

 EDtv (1999) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Matthew McConaughey, Jenna
Elfman, Woody Harrelson, Ellen DeGeneres, Martin Landau, Sally Kirkland and
Elizabeth Hurley.
 Inevitably, someone is going to liken EDtv to The Truman Show.
 But comparisons, in this case, are invalid.
 The only thing these two movies have in common is that both concern
individuals whose life is continually put before the public.
 But while Truman Burbank was the unwitting and unknowing star of his own
life, Ed Pekurny allows his life to be taped and presented uncensored to a
curious and, later, demanding public.
 Ron Howard's EDtv is a comedy about our obsession with fame and celebrity.
Along the way, it skewers our notion of what constitutes these qualities
and how people acquire them.
 Ed (Matthew McConaughey) is a loser. He's a 31-year-old transplanted Texan
working in a San Francisco video store when he is plucked from obscurity by
Cynthia (Ellen DeGeneres), the programming director for True TV, a new
network looking for an audience hook.
 Her idea is to follow around one person for 24 hours a day, seven days a
week, capturing every facet of his life on television.
 Cynthia chooses Ed because he is such a schnook, a good old boy with no
pretenses.
 At first, Ed likes the idea, but when he realizes the price that fame
costs him, his girlfriend and his family, he becomes disillusioned.
 The charm of Howard's film, written by his usual collaborators, Lowell
Ganz and Babaloo Mandel, is in the wonderful performances Howard elicits
from his all-star cast, which also includes Woody Harrelson, Jenna Elfman,
Martin Landau, the great Sally Kirkland, Dennis Hopper, Elizabeth Hurley
and Rob Reiner.
 The essence of screen acting is to perform as if the camera is not there.
To be successful, an actor cannot be self-conscious. A performer must
forget about the camera.
 But in EDtv, the cast has to continually switch emotions, going from
ignoring the camera to the realization that their lives are being shown
live nationwide. In other words, the actors must act self-consciously
during those scenes in which they realize they're being broadcast on video.
 It is not a simple task, yet Howard's cast is most successful at
differentiating between being on-camera and "on camera."
 McConaughey displays a goofy kind of innocence as Ed, even though his part
could have been an unsympathetic one. By not caring or realizing the havoc
his decision would rain on his family and friends, McConaughey's Ed comes
across as a bit of a self-absorbed geek.
 Yet his Ed is so likable, so down to earth, that we forgive his trespass
and root for him.
 Elfman, as Shari, the woman whom 71 percent of the people in a USA Today
poll say is no good for Ed, is wonderful and photogenic.
 Elfman is one of those actresses the camera loves. When she is on the
screen, she grabs a scene and holds it. She has charisma, warmth and sex
appeal.
 Harrelson is funny as Ed's braggart older brother who uses Ed's 15 minutes
of fame to promote his gym concept.
 DeGeneres is sly and witty as the TV programmer who continually manipulates Ed.
Landau almost steals the film as Ed's wise-cracking stepfather, while
Kirkland as his publicity-hungry mom is given little to do.
 Hurley contributes some nice physical comedy as the model who uses Ed as a
publicity ploy.
 The script continually cuts to various groups watching Ed's life unfold.
They are our Greek chorus, commenting on the action. It's a slick device
that keeps the movie moving.
 EDtv is not as vicious a satire as I would have liked. Its swipes at the
media are more jabs and love taps than uppercuts, and its finale seems
contrived.
 Still, it is an enjoyable two hours filled with solid performances and
some genuine laughs.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net.

Author
Adam Godfrey
  At times, you'd think EdTV would be an entertaining film. I mean, who can
resist the story of your average Joe becomming a celebrity by having his life
filmed every minute of every day? 
  But this average Joe, Ed Perkuny, (Matthew McConaughay), is a sappy, lifeless
creation that wanders around, trying to solve everyone's problems and settle
his own. McConaughay is awful, especially because he is trying to pull off his
usual Hollywood charm with a 3 week beard and torn jeans. Frankly, he had more
charm in the devestating flop The Newton Boys. He overacts in every way: his
overexaggerant body language, obsession with kissing women every second he gets
the chance, and that cliched scene where he loses someone in his life, and
drops to his knee and cries.
   The rest of the cast is very good; especially Martin Landau (as Ed's
step-father), who plays a cute role as the close-to-death old guy that makes
all the witty comments. Jenna Elfman is good, (but a little overemotional); her
main problem is that she keeps getting sucked into bad films, i.e. Can't Hardly
Wait, and Krippendorf's Tribe. Woody Harrelson, as Ed's brother Ray, does his
usual egg-headed role, with his comic wit as well (he wrote a book entitled,
"My Brother Pissed on Me.") Elizabeth Hurley is perfectly cast as the easy
slut, and Dennis Hopper, in a quick cameo as Ed's biological father, is a nice
choice (ironically coming after the role he turned down as Christof in The
Truman Show).
   Ellen Degeneres stood out as the executive who, after awhile, decides the
show must not go on much to the opposite of the head exec, Rob Reiner's
opinion.
   I hate to compare this film to The Truman Show, but the fact is, I was
ashamed to see this movie. It felt that I had dropped from College to
Kindergarten after seeing Truman and Ed. EdTV had no real wit or genius; it was
typical Hollywood. Extracting the TV part of the movie, you have the simple
plotline: Man steals brother's girlfriend, girlfriend leaves town, man gets new
slut girlfriend to feel like he can move on, slut breaks up with him, real
girlfriend comes back, and voila, you have a romance.
   I got so restless during this movie, I almost walked out. The only reason it
doesn't drop below a "C" grade is because of the fine supporting performances.
Grade: C-
Ad2am 
"I almost lost my nose...and I like it. I like breathing through it."
-Jack Nicholson, Chinatown
